I was wondering if this particular iPad2 was EVER going to get into Elizabeth's hands! :)
- A learning environment perfect for visual learners, taking it step by step! LOTS of pictures!
It was probably around early December where I started seriously considering writing a poem a day, inspired by various things around the web and when the new year kicked in I just started. I've also had ambitions to write a novel and I wanted something to get me writing everyday, and this is a really good idea to get me doing that.
Respect the privacy of others – allow others to have space – don’t stare
But, I think the best part of the holiday season is.......LIMITED EDITION PEPPERMINT STICK ICE CREAM! Mmmmmm!
Ollie is the ten year old son of a friend. He’s a massive Dr Who fan, and this story was a very risky Christmas present. He’s letting me post it here so presumably it didn’t embarrass the socks off him, even though I’m pretty sure his mother really IS River Song. You never see the two of them in the same room together anyway, and that’s proof, right?
As a kid, seeing pictures in motion was like seeing magic. Talking heads, walking legs and blinking eyes trapped in a box queerly called TV was almost supernatural. I would pull the curtains, darken the room and wait for the neon lights to take over. Those flickering blue, green and red beams of rapid montages were my idea of Midas touch. Everything they touched became neon.
Getting my Oncology clinical site visit over with. The instructor did not get to see me with any patients but I was able to talk my way through that one!
This is what happens with all my novels. I can't crack on with the word count until the characters spark to life, which leads me to admiring them so much, flaws and all, that I can't help wanting the best for them.
And I know that I’m not alone, because I have asked a lot of people if they have the same memory.
Spontaneous variations in light intensity, needed to make the rest...
It was quite a bit colder early in the morning. And I mean early, we got there around 7:30. But it was worth the loss in sleep! :) This was a much more family friendly atmosphere. I didn't see anyone smoking or drinking and there were lots of kiddos running around. And it was not jam packed like during the races.
From the beginning there was passion. The smiling voice at Comcast asked if we’d had any experience with “bundling”. I was too embarrassed to admit I hadn’t, but my quavering voice betrayed me. Bundling, she explained, was technology monogamy. We really didn’t need those old friends. We could get all we wanted from our new friend, Comcast.
Dan: Well, ummm… I’m going to write you all the details about it in an email today.
Even less deserving of pity are Liberal Democrat supporters, whether they voted for the party or, horrified by the realities of power voted Labour, they are equally suicidal. However, given it is now quite clear Liberal Democrats are not grown up, they deserve little more than our contempt.
Absolut Blue - 40%
-By blogging about marriage and family on my blog (I throw books stuff in now and again :)
Will the difference between toasted or not change the world? No.
THE CLASSIC ART CAR BOOT SALE - MARGO QUINN puts together a car boot sale full of arty goodies - and all knocked out at reasonable prices from the boots ( ' trunks ' if your American ) of 10 gorgeous classic motors supplied by the one and only St Eammon McKenna at SCANBITZ.
After that a group of us went out on wine tasting. I didn’t do any tastings, because I decided to drive. When we got back from the tasting tour, we went back to our new friends’ camp site and spent the evening partying.
I used the phone in their bedroom, and noticed that
‘I mean it, what can we do?’
I got to the location by taxi. I stepped inside the gate and it was a different world. Jakarta is just like any other big cities. Jakarta is very modern and you don’t see too many traditional or cultural pieces on a daily basis. Seeing and being in the Roemah Djawa was a whole cultural immersing experience to me.
Before you download Securimage there are some prerequisites to consider. You must have PHP installed with the GD option. The GD library is used for image manipulation. If you installed WAMP as I recommended, GD is automatically available. Everything else you will need in this session will come from Securimage. Okay, next we download Securimage from here – http://www.phpcaptcha.org/download/.
My children have suffered a lot, feared a lot, and I can’t ever change that, take it back, fix it. But I do try every day to make up for it in any way that I can. I think it has made them better human beings. They are more caring, kind, considerate, understanding individuals than they would have been. They have at times been my caregivers. Help me get from the couch to the bathroom. Bring me a glass of water when I am vomiting. Little things. But it’s those little things that mean a great deal. They are turning into fine young men, and I am so proud of them for that. I have started growing closer to my family just in the past year, but I am still very guarded with them, still afraid of being let down and hurt. My husband deserves a medal or something for dealing with all of this. He helps me when he can and tries to pick up the slack around the house when I physically can’t do it. He has been my angel here on earth. He is the only one who has stuck by my side through all of this no matter what.
As I ruminate on the big and the small, let's write about magnitude and scale. Anything on the continuum is fair game. Leave me a note about your poem and I'll post the results here later this week.
More about that and growing up in my next post. I hope to be doing them more regularly now.
I seriously have stickers from ... 15 years ago... I NEED TO PURGE. Please feel free to join me with this one.
Screenshots have emerged about a character looking very much like Sonic the Hedgehog wearing a cloak and hood. Rumors quickly spread that a new Sonic game is in the works, and SuperBlogBoy had to ask SEGA what it was all about. “After the success of Sonic Colors and Sonic Generations, Sonic will return to his 3D roots once again.” Over the years, Sonic has occasionally retired from running around aimlessly to trying out guns, swords, driving and turning into a werewolf. The new game looks to add to that list by turning our favorite blue hedgehog into an assassin. “Assassin’s Creed showed the world how cool assassinating can be. Although the game can be kind of slow, Sonic can add a whole new dimension to fast killing. With his size, speed, and attitude, Sonic seems perfect for stealth games.” Set in medieval times, the still unnamed game will have Sonic and his pals battle Eggman, as tradition goes. The difference is that there will be a new RPG element added to the game. Sonic would be the stealthy, quick assassin, Knuckles is the more powerful attack minded character, and Tails is the “wizard”, as his ability to fly is considered magic in that time period. “Sonic has been running quickly for years now, it is time for something fresh to renew interest in the series. With the success of Final Fantasy and other great RPGs, this new Sonic is a guaranteed masterpiece.” Claims the creative director of SEGA. The jury is still out on whether Sonic makes the return he so richly deserves. While we wait for more details to emerge, here is the screenshot of what looks like Sonic will be wearing in his next adventure.
Our family room set up was part of the issue for a very long time – but I addressed that earlier this year with our new sofa and moving the TV. LOVE it still – probably the best changes I’ve made to our home.
outies used to freak me out a little bit until i fell for bear's.
During her childhood in California, Becky frequently produced homemade plays starring her sisters, friends, and cousins. These plays almost always featured a heroine, a prince, and a love story with a happy ending. She's been a fan of all things romantic ever since.
I am amazed by God. The beauty that was available today as the sun shined and the trees began to show their buds was something to behold. After so many months of winter, it was just a treat to have such a wonderful day today.
BELL'S - Oberon (So stop asking...Haha!)
It shows the names of the towns they had started wihich carried names such as Lydenburg, ( Place of Suffering) Vryheid, ( Place of Freedom) Pietermaritzburg, (named after the famous Voortrekker leader) Pilippolis and Bethulie, (named after their beloved Bible) and Potchefstroom, Rustenburg, Winburg and Bloemfontein... as they Trekked, the Boers named the map of South Africa, and many of its vegetation and wildlife as well.
New Belgium Brewing Inc. 2° Below Winter Ale
have a clear view
TRAVEL!!!!!
In both classes, we talked about passwords and the different situations in which they are used, like Constance and D'Artagnan used a password to get D'Artagnan recognized at the Louvre. In the junior class, we played Password, which is just like "Telephone" in that you try and whisper a three word password around the circle and get it safely around without any changes. We had a lot of fun with that.
Even going to Mass or Confession do not in themselves indicate that we are Catholic. If I go to Mass but pick and choose from a menu which parts of Christ's teaching to follow then what right do I have to go round telling people that being Catholic is about guilt?
In October 2011 the Obama administration announced finalization of an agreement between the Fish and Wildlife Service and Wyoming Gov. Matt Mead whereby the agency would remove wolves in Wyoming from the federal endangered species list and the state would only be required to keep alive 100 wolves or 10 breeding pairs outside Yellowstone and Grand Teton national parks (which together provide habitat for a few dozen wolves that would remain protected while in the parks).
December 26, 2010
But as far as Perrault and the Grimms are concerned, I think Little Red Riding Hood's downgrading to foolish, helpless character has as much to do with age as gender. It was totally in keeping with Victorian children's literature to feature a child (of either gender) who is severely punished for disobeying their parents. The Victorian attitude towards children is really quite condescending-there was no consideration that a child could make the right choice on their own, but has to be terrified into obeying. In this tale it's the foolish child and the old woman who have to be rescued by the adult, not just the women who need to be rescued by the man. Feminism is a bigger deal right now than ageism so we tend to miss that aspect of it.
Next sunday we will publish the TOP 3 of our last challenge and & thanks so much for playing with us during our first year together.
One turns to me his appealing eyes-poor boy! I never knew you,
Your health is one of the only things you can control, and the healthier you are, the happier you are. It really does feed into every aspect of your life. It’s so important for younger people to realize this – by developing healthy habits, they can virtually erase disease later in life.
The motive for our dedication should be that, each day, there should be less of us and more of Him so that in our yielding ourselves as a Living Sacrifice to the Father, we might Glorify Jesus in accord with St. Paul’s exhortation:
trying to keep the children warm.
Well, when I talked to him I was at one of those tipsy canvas type deals (you drink wine while painting). I got trashed. I’m not a big wine drinker so I can’t handle it like my beer. And then I broke every rule I could possibly have and sent this text:
a matter of fact there are records of Masonic guilds both in
KERRY DAVISON, daddy's little princess with a passion for pink and a penchant for Fabulous Induced Breakdowns. Now meet
So, Spotify is coming to Australia any week now (or so we keep hearing), but I’m not sure how many guys over here actually know what Spotify is, so I thought I’d do a quick once over.
Finally got into my area and the driver finally said “amma, i didn’t die” evidently he thought that we had tricked him to his death…. as if i KNEW that the earthquake was going to come. I mean COME ON MAN!
Anyway, off to some town I can’t pronounce in two weeks. I don’t usually cover the Girls Tell All, but maybe I’ll live tweet or post if compelled. It’s usually just a clusterfuck. We’ll see. Feel free to talk me into it. Ben should have kept The Undertaker.
The mainstream says that more is better. Be busy all the time. Spend your money on useless stuff.
35 Rue du Faubourg-Montmartre
Stickles in Silver Ice
forget these dreams.
SHORT TERM: European selling drives market lower, DOW -102
Cost: $11 per person
I once read a passage, I believe it was from "Brennan Manning" where he was talking about our Papa, our Abba Father, Christ. He, like myself, found himself easily distracted and sometimes even unable to focus on God when he was trying to simply pray. I am CONSTANTLY DISTRACTED...I try to remind myself that I must focus on only one thing at a time. Brennan compared this situation to a little toddler who crawled up on his father's lap. He was gibbering at his dad one second, then the next he was crawling down to look at something shiny or new that caught his attention. His reminder was, do you think that the Father cared or loved his child any less because he was distracted? No, he simply delighted in his child...he was thrilled to hold him, watch him, dote over him. And just think, that dad wasn't even perfect. Our Heavenly Father rejoices over us. He takes pride in our every movement, our every step. He loves us-He's adopted us-He rejoices over us! We are so blessed!
A company spokeperson told members of the press they are now hoping to pay for the return of the bike to Yokoyama and to see if they can restore it for him.
Friday, 17:00
Arrange mixed salad leaves onto a large platter. Place butternut squash and beetroot on top.
of self deception.
I will eventually get back to updating this blog more & apologise for lack of presence!!
Why is the Word coming a second time? To make God known to a people who refuse to repent and believe. The first time, Jesus made God known as Savior. The second time, Jesus will make God known as Judge.
It is estimated the handful of feathers from the extinct bird could be worth around $40,000, but those who have been guardians of the bird fear the loss of heritage value is much greater.
A tummy zerbert from a 4 year old zerbert expert. (humbles me and makes me laugh every time....even if I am exposing my "I'm-not-pregnant-dammit-belly" in line at Trader Joe's)
Keep torturing myself by looking at the weather reports for Portland.
Andy Griffith, 85, said in a statement that accompanied the Lindsay family's announcement of the death, "George Lindsey was my friend. I had great respect for his talent and his human spirit."
The Repossession by Sam Hawksmoor
I was using satire to make a point about free speech to someone else. Now, I just knew it would come back at me, in the form of a quote mine as it did, but something else happened that I didn't expect.
1. Backup your device using App Backup & Restore, do not that this App does not back all apps, so as a secondary option also use the Google backup option for apps.
l. What time did you get up this morning? Well...my ALARM went off at 6:51. I didn't get my lazy ass out of bed until 7:40. Damn you snooze button!!
He developed a strong crush on a girl I knew quite well. Anna was a well-mannered, gentle soul, who would never have been capable of telling him to simply fuck off. It is questionable as to whether this would have worked anyway; he seemed to be completely impervious to signals, hints and even insults, though he could react verbally aggressively if he felt threatened. If you were sitting in a group which included Anna in the college restaurant or bar, you could be sure that he would join it. She put up with him, pleasantly and patiently, as he sat too near to her, noisily breathing through his nose.
9 months after ‘coming home’, we are ‘going home’ again with our family.
13And I beheld, and heard an angel flying through the midst of heaven, saying with a loud voice, Woe, woe, woe, to the inhabiters of the earth by reason of the other voices of the trumpet of the three angels, which are yet to sound!
I was so busy taking it all in, I didn't snap many photos. BUT here's the ones I did take!
»Sometime later…«
They were all scripted by Gary Russell with art by Lee Sullivan, colour by Alan Craddock and lettering by Elitta Fell.
JJ (of the Border Patrol) and Woo-Girl Rachel (of G.I. Joe) decide to team up to work faster and keep Big Brother Rachel from getting the answer. I still think Border Patrol is too volatile for their own good and should have done more prep running, but I hate them less. It turns out Mark from Bubba Gump has a bit of an advantage as he used to work in a cattle-yard and he's "good at figgerin'". I have to admit, they're growing on me. Big Brother Rachel descends into crying hysterics. As usual. She "doesn't know anything about cows" (it's basic third-grade math, not a cow trivia competition) and "she's really bad at math". She continues to throw a tantrum even after Mark tells her he's good at math and Brendon has basically shouted at him to help her. DON'T DO IT, MARK! Helping means that Mark does the math and the legwork and Rachel stops snivelling like a two-year-old. I suppose that's something.
“Concierge!” His voice resounded in the room, and everyone within earshot turned to stare. He crossed the lobby in long bold strides as the concierge rushed to meet him.
I realize I haven't posted a "dash of happy" song in a while. It's not because there's any lack of good music - it's just general busyness, and I guess I also haven't heard a song that made me think, "yes, that's the one!" Well, this week, I heard one.
I was soon put in my place, because not only was she serious, she was so serious that she kept me on her porch for 5 minutes while she ranted about how, "The government should have gotten all those assholes out of office years ago and then we wouldn't be in this mess. And what are we doing supporting illegal immigrants anyway? All those damn liberals have screwed us up and taken our money and I'm not going to give one more cent for them to clean up their messes!"
I was enjoying my extended summer vacation in US, with the usual day time routine of playing Legacy of Ancients on a Commodore 64, followed by a 2-hour football practice with my cousins Arif and Abid and their friend VJ (that’s a name: Vittorio Junior).
Next up was the University Museum of Zoology and then the Whipple Museum. You may be wondering why we stayed indoors today and the answer lies in the weather. The forecast was torrential rains and rain it did. At least indoors, we were kept dry. In the afternoon, we headed to the Botanic Gardens and when it started to rain again, we hung out in the green house. Not bad planning around the fickle UK weather, eh?
3/31/2006 12.23pm
Trying to review these films (watched or not) has led me to become very upset at the way BPD is portrayed in the movies, I really do not think that BPD is as bad as what these films show, actually I am not convinced that you could even call most of these characters people with BPD, it seems to be something much worse to me.
For the first time, Cebu City will have a float entry for the Sinulog grand parade on January 17. The float is the city’s way of thanking the Sto. Niño for the City’s first sale of SRP (South Road Properties) lots last year, and for the full recovery of Mayor Tomas Osmeña from urinary bladder cancer, according to Sun Star Cebu report.
That was five years ago now. I've only wavered once, on a day when I just had that feeling. Selected the names, popped into the bank and then to the bookies. I'd swear my hands were shaking as my mind formed arguments for and against. In the end, it didn't' matter. The machine was bust. I'd have to go back later.
So many people have written about their Top 10 Christmas movies. I could make a list too, but it would include quite a few movies that don't make other lists. Do you have any other ideas for me?
I made response to him with bashful forehead.
Winding narrow stairways and alleys
Make no mistake. Introductions on flights are a bad omen. She might as well have said "Hi there. I'm here to make this flight as comfortable and relaxing as an enema of chinese throwing stars."
67) If you were a tear in my eye I would not cry for fear of losing you.
This is the first drawing he did of me.
So, what do you say, should we get rid of all the should thoughts right away?
- 4oz. reduced fat shredded Cheddar Jack (Sargento)
she shrugged her shoulders like it was no big deal and went scouring through her pockets for a cigarette lighter. she was wearing a white lab jacket that must have had three hundred pockets, so i picked up mine, leaned across the table, and lit it for her. she took a deep drag, sighed, and exhaled. she seemed to relax completely at that moment.
where you have gone, each wave
· However, the most expensive may not always be the best- look at the ingredients and make sure a meat is the very first ingredient.
"I said rock'n'roll chicken darling!"
Right now, life after graduation might feel like an (effect) abyss. You might worry about floundering alone or that one wrong step will doom your future. But look around you: you are not alone. And today? Today is a no more a defining moment than yesterday or tomorrow. I know I’ve been most successful when I belong to others, and I have grown more when I act as a community member instead of an individualist.
I was sitting beside the lake of my childhood summers, Lake Stephanie, with my legs knee deep in the shallows when it approached. I was gazing at the red and gold fish swimming lazily in the sparkling water, the aquatic blues and greens merging into each other, like the paua shells my little brother Thomas used to collect. I was so deeply immersed in thoughts of happier times with Thomas, that when a dark shape appeared beside my reflection in the water, it scared the hell out of me, it's intense blackness stark against the whiteness of my skin.
3. Add squid, cook until the color changed. Add sweet soy sauce, tomato sauce, oyster sauce, pepper, sugar and salt.
Heat oven to 350F. Spray a 12-cup muffin tin with nonstick cooking spray, or use paper liners; set aside. In large bowl, whisk together flour, oats, chocolate chips, baking powder, baking soda and salt. In medium bowl, whisk together yogurt, honey, oil, egg and vanilla.
VG:Thanks, Tim - it is intriguing to see the editorial process alongside the writers own creative one. Another question: Who is the poem addressed to?
35. Mountain Horse – 1 gold + Exalted with Gilneas
Maybe this link between bad handwriting and doctors is just a coincidence. It is possible that doctors have come under unfair scrutiny because their profession entails that they perpetually dispense samples of their handwriting. If lawyers wrote down prescriptions, would the terrible handwriting myth pertain to them instead? Probably some doctors have really beautiful and neat handwriting. Who will get to prove that they exist?
Through February 28th
A- I started doing this because it looked fun. Truly, what else gives an adult a chance to make a mess with glitter and paint and still be legitimately occupied? Plus I like crafts, and playing with paper. I must confess I never scored well in Art while in school, and I blame it on the fact that I’m left handed and thus to write from left to right you either have to angle the paper, or your head, or both, and this way of looking at the world carried over to art class, and so my vases were always on the verge of tipping over and the bananas… well, let’s just say they didn’t look like any bananas that Nature created!! Back to the point of this, I discovered that with scrapbooking, it didn’t matter which hand I used, I could create works of art, which satisfied a need in me. Plus, I happened upon it at the time when my children were still young enough that I had the opportunity to use all the photographs I took to preserve their stories, and so I jumped wholeheartedly into this hobby and never looked back. Everything I’ve done, for myself and for them, will be my legacy to them.
like that night the rain
Here’s what they have to say about making dinner:
4 tsp sesame seeds, toasted
assalamu aleikum dear readers!
A coyote attacking
how the house dons full camouflage gear,
people like miss snotty pants grocery shopper lady? you were a child once. you probably screamed just like this, in a grocery store similar to this one, while your poor, tired mother tried to shush you and get everything she needed to feed your cranky butt. if you have such a problem with noise and chaos, you may need to reconsider where you spend your time. a grocery store in the middle of the day may not be the best place for you. also, family restaurants are probably not the wisest choice.
Richard Lanard Allen, 30, New York, N.Y.
I've never participated in a giveaway so I thought I would make my first venture into this new world with aplomb and in concert with the last days of my March Madness Sale! My friends at Singing Three Little Birds are hosting the giveaway.
As each and every one of you peel off the layers of ego more and more and discover the energies of the higher realms, your etheric, spiritual states begin to recognize and reflect this happening and you are yourselves exposed to the continually pure energies of the higher realms in measured ways, but in ways that will see you prepared as needed in accordance with you own peeling-away and integrating of the etheric layers of ego that have been holding back your perception of ever purer realms of consciousness, even if only slightly.
a thankful mind
Early Days of Adventure Movies
While this is a good idea, I have an even better one. How about congress gets paid based on their approval rating? Right now, and for the last couple of years at least, congress has had an approval rating below 20%. So under my plan they would make a little under 20% of their annual salary. Do you think if that were the case they would start listening to "We the People"? I bet they would, in a second.
The change might sound like good news: more fish.
Someday, they may even do a cold case special on us. – Lenore
I don’t think you do. Authentic leadership is a skill and not a position. And it is essential for anyone who wants to bring their best to their work and life.
Each page has a yellow ribbon tag, glued down with a yellow button and the brick road runs throughout linking everything together. The yellow bricks are painted with the wrong end of a tiny alpha stamp.
The lines are a lot less visible and the forehead looks so much more smoother. This lasts for about 5 hrs on myself as well which is pretty good going.
My girl Cassie, is someone I actually met through this blog. And for that, I must give giant thank you hugs to blog of mine for bringing us together. Well, we haven't met face to face, YET, however, she is one of my most dearest virtual BFF's.
I was filled to the brim with love and joy. My heart aches today, but I know that Heavenly Father has promised me great blessings if I am obedient. I trust in Him. I love Him. I am grateful for the tender mercies He has shown me each day of my life.
“What do you think about Paris?” she asked, pausing in the doorway to adjust her Ugg boot. I was surprised to see her. I had been with Ogilvy for two years, so there was rarely a reason for her to come into my office. I put the chocolate aside—already looking forward to getting back to its thin, almost-bitter bite later—and gave her my full attention.
There are...Puzzle Palace doings just now that force my hands to be...circumspect these days. So I've opted for quiet in place of the vague mundane.
Andrew: ur going to see it eventually lol
And if the Bible is no longer authoritative as God's word then you are free to conjecture other possible gods that might exist, like a scientific one who has been creating and then re-creating one universe after another to see how the creatures in his universes behave. I see no reason why a god could not have created this one last universe from a quantum wave fluctuation with all of the fine tuning needed to produce this universe before committing deicide. There are many possibilities like this, none of which would ever lead you to that a Triune God sent his son to die and rise from the grave. So at that point you jettison these other god hypotheses as irrelevant to properly understanding why we exist and you simply trust science to do its thing.
As many of you know, I live on a mountain. It's pretty secluded, especially in winter. We have to maintain about two miles of road. It's not your average straight, flat road either. There's a couple super steep parts, a little dam, and lots of twists and turns. But really, that's not so bad. It's the wind--it makes it really hard to keep the road open so we usually end up snowmobiling, or skiing, or just plain walking, which can be really fun and sometimes not so fun when it's freezing cold and the snow is tearing into your face like little shards of glass and you have kids and groceries to bring safely home from your car you've parked miles away. It also makes you write run on sentences. So, this year my husband and I decided that it would make life easier (and maybe my writing would improve) if we moved for the winter to somewhere that the roads are plowed by someone other than ourselves. Brilliant, aren't we?
(I know I haven't explained his terms (strong/weak awareness, SPO, etc), but given my current time constraints, this is the best I can do for now. Feel free to ask questions in the comments, and I'll answer them as I have time.)
As usual I'm using U.S. terms
His body was covered in bruises, his hands smashed, eyes swollen and black, and the neck was broken. His genitals had been severed, and he had scars on his body that suggested whipping with a cable and electric shocks.
And the slant spirits trooping by
Color Wonder markers are so funtastic because my wonderful little man can "accidentally" color on his walls, floor, furniture or self with one of the markers, and it WILL NOT SHOW UP! Every mom's dream right? Making them perfect candidates to be displayed in his room, in this super fantastic red bucket with a star shape cutout. Little P and I snagged this bucket-o-love from Goodwill for a buck. And it matches his color scheme and decor to a giant T:
As I ponder daily what things I might subject you my loyal readers to I have created yet… that’s right… another list. And boy are you guys and gals in for a real treat! Just you wait and see. And with all these lists at my beck and call… I’ll never run out of ideas!
Solr is, literally, 10x faster than MSSQL on raw (uncached) searches. Wow, wtf…are the results crap like Cleo?
So basically an individual, oh, politician perhaps can have a personal dislike for a joke and that is therefore offensive and cannot be broadcast? Or if say the Ahle Sunnat Wal Jamaat (ASWJ) feel an entertainment channel is “offensive to commonly accepted standards of decency” that means the channel should go? Why did you bother drawing up a code if this is a free-for-all based on personal likes and dislikes? This is a very poor definition open to exploitation. It should be dropped as other parts of the code already provide ample accountability for what can really be deemed offensive i.e. content which discriminates and spreads “hatred or contempt on the basis of race or caste, national, ethnic or linguistic origin, colour or religion or sect, sex, sexual orientation, age or mental or physical disability.”
It's flexible and dried clear. You can feel a residue obviously and it does have the slightest shine but this would vary for different fabrics. I'm using a sheer that frays and it worked really well.
I need God….
I gritted my dentures. “I just said, I don’t own a machine anymore, and I’m certainly not going to sew the thing by hand.”
The obvious problem is the one that arises when you have to choose one event over another. I had this problem last week when The Royal Mail on Spencer and The Local Taphouse in St Kilda hosted Beer Dinners on the same night.
Psychology
I’ll always come to your rescue
Since then, the dry spell has recently been showered with some “rain”! In the past two weeks, I have been blessed with:
Roasted Pepper Sorrel Coulis
Reese calls the police, but they just put her on hold. At the same time, Natalie tries to call Paul, but his voicemail picks up. To complete the trifecta of phone scenes, Sasha is back at the radio station, making fun of students calling her about dumb sex stuff. Sasha doesn't realize it, but her producer is murdered while she's taking the call. She approaches his booth, and when lightning strikes, sees the killer swinging an axe at the window.
the coffee brewed again,
heartbeat increased in intensity as the Warden's agents came closer to where she hid. She had to get away, but couldn't think of how. Then suddenly one of the flashlight beams crossed over her, and the a man's yell of triumph echoed through the warehouse. "Got her! She's over here!" Willow closed her eyes as panic raced through
if ONE of you is late, it is costly to send them all to each person. Then you will not be able to do the swap again for 3 months. SORRY, gotta do it!
Sorry for my lack of posts's again.
Aches, chills, sore throat, coughing, all around crappiness.
Due to limited space, please RSVP as soon as possible at (718) 287-0943
D'Arienzo in general makes some people feel a bit seasick, and this is a very marked example.You might listen to this and feel alarmed and queasy rather than excited - it could go either way.
And things are very quiet today. And slow. The whole day feels odd. I just hope is doesn’t drag this much all day. Maybe I should go run an errand at lunch. To cut up the day. Or not. I have my happy tea and my happy book and my happy Pomegranate Greek yogurt.
KEECH M, SCOTT AJ, RYAN PJ. The impact of influenza and influenza like illness on productivity and healthcare resource utilisation in a working population. Occup Med 1998; 48: 85-90.
2-2-2-2-2 Perfect Pull Ups followed by:
Overall, I think Jill did a pretty decent job, at least insofar as getting a plug in for all of her charity events. The interviewer tries to trip her up with questions such as "it's hard to see crisis around here" motioning to her cluttered showcase of a home, but she responds with "we've worked hard for what we have." He asks her if she feels any guilt. Nope--"if you spend more than you have, then you have problems" is her answer. Easy to say when you have so much money that you run out of things to spend it on.
Well, you could read several books such as The Long Emergency, Reinventing Collapse, One Second After, Alas Babylon, Patriots, and Lucifer's Hammer to gain an understanding of what some recent authors believe TEOTWAWKI might look like, and then try to formulate a plan on your own. You could also read countless blog posts on
….that 48 people were killed in 1980 when a space-launch rocket exploded whilst being fuelled at Plesetsk in the then Soviet Union.
Stephen J. Colaio, 32, Montauk, N.Y.
The Court of Appeal dismissed Helmet's appeal. In its view
Next post: new books for May! Wheee!
9pm – 2am
200-230g / 7-8 oz puff pastry (either fresh, or frozen that has been thawed)
On many websites, space on every page has been devoted to advertising. You might have noticed it, if you've got eyes in your head. This takes the form of spaces that are just too small to contain anything of value, impact or interest. Often, each space on the page is taken by a different advertiser, and will flash, burp, spin and thrash independently of all the rest, so that the page ends up looking like someone with epilepsy was given a pen and asked, 'Could you draw your very, very worst nightmare?'
Growing up in the south, I can remember my grandparents talking about working in the “baccer” field and how much hard work it was. My mom and her cousins worked in their grandparents field every summer priming tobacco. Although it was grueling and backbreaking work, my mom said she learned a lot in those fields about hard work, determination, and faith. Mom says that grandma told stories in the field and made sure they all knew where they came from. I am so thankful for the teachings that grandma gave my mom, because she passed them down to me. I’ve always wanted a piece of this history in my home, but I wanted it to also fit with my decor. I decided that a huge tobacco basket would be just the right statement piece to have in our home and have been looking for one for the past year and I found the perfect one over the weekend at an excellent price of only $25. Tobacco baskets are super hard to come by especially when they are intact and in relative good condition. Most baskets I have seen on ebay are at least $50 and about the same to ship.
So I made a promise to myself: I would do right by this little girl. Granted, I’ve been on the road to loving and appreciating myself for a few months now. But having a visual reminder made me realize how important it really is for me to be on this road if I’m ever going to truly live and love life and if I’m ever going to fully reconcile my childhood self with my adult self. It’s still a little sad looking at those photos of me just because I think of all the time I lost in choosing to not appreciate myself. But knowing that I’ve been actively learning to have grace and love for myself in the last few months helps to take the sting away. And even though I haven’t been going on too many noteworthy adventures of late, learning to choose adventures over fear in everyday life is helping me to do right by that little girl. And by me.
Lest you think that this is the disgruntled whining of a techno-idiot, I want you to know that an IT guy has been holding my hand every step of the way. Not only can't we get answers, it takes a month to get a useless reply.
A shriek from Katie reminded me an altercation with Nathan might supply a permanent fix for my migraine problems. I grabbed the broom off the floor and unscrewed the handle. I chugged down the hallway with my walrus-like gait and made it back to the classroom in time to see Nathan forcing his lips on Katie's tear-stained face. His massive arms held her immobile while she writhed in disgust. I was too angry at the sight to wait for my panting to slow.
In elementary school my teachers would also ask me to help them draw special things to decorate their doors or bulletin boards, or help make posters for school plays and things like that. Thus began my graphic designing- combining pictures and words into books and on posters. Once someone asks you to design a poster then it's kind of contagious and you keep getting asked to draw posters, so you keep getting better, so that you get asked more often to make them... and then you see what happens.
Bite the Bullet
Then i felt and heard breathing next to my face. I was screaming inside. Was this a burglar? Was this a nightmare?
Describing his reception as "the only action in my life which I am quite certain I have never regretted," Baring sought to elucidate the forces at work in his conversion in the admirable sonnet sequence "Vita Nuova." The first sonnet deals with the initial approach to conversion: "I found the clue I sought not, in the night, While wandering in a pathless maze of gloom." The second sonnet describes the act of conversion itself, the desire to linger no longer "in a separated porch" and the sudden realization that the fire was "ablaze beyond the gate." He knocks "and swiftly came the answering word," inviting him to enter into his own estate where "my broken soul began to mend":
1 poked
The observatory, restored in 1992, now houses the Center for the Study of Southern Culture.
782 D-IX/26/1979. “Mildred Elizabeth Tress (1910-1979).” Bond Chapel, The University of Chicago, Chicago, Illinois.
0430-0505 - Ezra Furman & The Harpoons
The rake and my new leaf-grabbers, plus a fair few black sacks, are my companions for a bracing clearing up of fallen leaves. I always make leaf compost and next year I am going to use it for this.
In 1951, Burl Ives recorded a traditional version of "The Twelve Days of Christmas".
Thank you, again, Betty.
I’ve been a bad blogger as of late. There are all sorts of loose ends floating around. I mean, I told you all about my birthday preparations, but then never told you how it was! I asked everyone what I should do with my wedding cake deposit, but never told you what I did! I also hinted that Chef and I are still hanging out, and then I never gave you any details! Well, I’m going to right that wrong this second.
ps 2.
Hi just a short post from me today. Finishing off the cards for my hubby and starting on my class samples...just waiting from my PI parcel which I hope will arrive today.
In my opinion it went well. I could share with you some of the things I did, and maybe should have done.
“Don’t you think you should be revising?” I said.
You've made it through your first month, Son! Just as importantly, I've made it through your first month, which I value as a real accomplishment given the total disdain with which I regard the physical nature of those first few days post-birthing. Don't worry, it's not your fault. You are small and warm and needy in all the right ways, just like I had hoped. I love your little baby movements, all jerky and uncontrolled. I love the smell of you right after a bath and the way your neck looks so thin when it's all stretched out during a yawn. I even love the loud, snorty sort of way you breathe at night, full of hiccups and grunts and other-worldly sort of noises that I can't imagine your tiny throat accommodating.
The next projects coming up for me are a psychological thriller as well as a comedy web series. I can’t reveal any titles yet though.
What’s his problem?
Humanity must first find itself within itself; then it must find itself in the world.
So that's this year's plan. Make it more interesting, increase the tension, feel the characters, make it with words, visually alive. I read over the story while waiting to pick up my son at school. And there is one benefit in having waited so long, it does feel new to me. And I am able to see things more clearly. I'm not afraid of my own little red pen, strike it out! This doesn't work, that doesn't work. And it doesn't hurt me to say it, to do it, it feels empowering, because I know. There isn't the lost confusion (at the moment) of- is this better? is that? ugh I don't know. So whenever I know things need to be reworked, and why, and have a clue as to how, I am happy. Really happy.
Film: The First Grader
The origins of the Liebster Blog Award are unclear but the word translates from German as "darling" or "beloved". It's given to bloggers who have less than 200 followers in order to generate some traffic for them.
Roy: I don’t know, I just thought I’d ask.
Beyond this place of wrath and tears
Its always been my take that this project will fail on economic grounds, and that Tamboran were merely here to onward spin the licence and investors would lose out.
There were other people at the party, but I had so much fun taking pictures of Layla, I'm afraid I didn't get many of the other guests. It was a beautiful day, though. Afterwards, Jerry and I went to visit my friend Lindy and her family. We spent the night with them before heading home on Sunday. Our evening was just as fun as the day. Jerry and Lindy's son, Anthony, played Pokemon on their DSs well into the night and Lindy, Scott (her husband) and I drank lots of wine and sat around on their comfy chairs talking all night.
People get used to them and they fail to take them in. Say something fresh or different. Don't say "at the end of the day" - say "in the end"; don't say "put it to the acid test" - say "test thoroughly". "Cutting edge" or "state of the art" mean "newest"
4. What is your favorite mistake and why?
It’s Christmas Eve, 1938, when Madge Arwell comes to the aid of an injured Spaceman Angel as she cycles home, in this year’s Doctor Who Christmas Special, starring Matt Smith as the Doctor.
I immediately fell in love, but I almost didn't buy it, which is crazy. Thankfully, Lindsay talked some sense into me, and reassured me that it was well worth the $22 I paid for it.
Raines is one of my favorite bars in the city. It’s a speakeasy, but not too speakeasy. No real gimmicks, just a dimly lit bar with dashing bartenders and amazing cocktails.
It’s my belief that it’s silly to ask someone if they are ‘left’ or ‘right’.
Imagine if we could prove that the asthma epidemic in this country is due to auto-immune problems generated by toxic food.
5. I recently acquired vintage magnifying filters. Awesome really. I have yet to try it out.
I was going to call it 'just because I wear blue doesn't mean I am blue' tuesdays, but Brian nixed it and said it was too long, and then i said 'ah, i think its funny', and he said that it actually wasn't.
This is not what I had planned to do in the first place, but when I laid it out on the bed to see what it would look like, I really didn't like it so with the help of my mom, we came up with this !
I did nothing to point out that, thought she didn’t know who she was, she seemed to remember me just fine. I guess I slipped through the cracks in her fictitious memory loss saga.
project that promotes the image used to create the project. In other words,
In early ‘seventies ’3-day-week’ Great Britain, share-a-ride became an everyday occurrence, nobody drove a car without at least two other passengers, public transport was in full use and the struggling population again became aware of their parents’ post-war attitude of ‘conserving’ energy. It is possible that the present crisis may bring about a similar respect for alternative means to get from A to B, and consequently even more respect for the entity which caused the hiccup in the first place: Mother Earth.
He mentioned that he’d like to get more for them and was going to try, but he’d use me as a last out of he needed. Well, it turns out there was no local love for his bugs, so he wound up making good on the deal, and I wound up with even more “too many” bugs than I already had. Let it be known that I even tried to talk him out of it when I was making the final deal. It wasn’t until then that I found out that he was moving out of state and his stuff had already been shipped. Despite my best efforts, I walked away with the models.
2. Pray for Lifeline as they partner with the new orphanages. Pray that the lives us the doctors who go to assist these children will forever be changed by that experience.
The colour combination here is Pear Pizzazz, Blushing Bride, Regal Rose and Whisper White.
Yes, I can hardly breathe.
Method Two – Converting part of Compensation Package
Our conversation throughout lunch consisted of many, erm- interesting topics. We shared our thoughts on varies books and films, our interests, and a few sadistic jokes because we all know how romantic I am (sarcasm intended).
– You couldn’t do it now?
It’s not very often I do two posts in the same 24 hours, but, I’ve enjoyed the quietest, laziest, most kicked-back day I’ve had for quite a while… Consequently I’m feeling totally ‘chill-axed’, (yes, I really did say that, what a tool!) and at peace with the world…So I thought, even though I’d already blogged about a girl and a prawn, (check the archive, its not as bad as it sounds),I’d spread a little extra SHPics travel-style goodness into the blogosphere. At least I hope it’s goodness, not really for me to judge.
So I'm going to have a pleasant mini blog tour next week, where I'll be a guest blogger on three sites run by some of my friends, who all happen to be lovely writers. I'll be talking about a little bit about Tornado Siren, and a lot about balancing a zillion different writing projects, switching back and forth between prose and plays, and the pluses and minuses of self-publishing an ebook.
Your seed choices here should definetly include Gold seeds from the casino. Item seeds can be thrown in as an extra but I don't recommend going crazy with item seeds. Yes, it CAN help, but you'd probably be better putting small seeds of strength or agility instead. Item % only adds to the drop rate's chance. Say you want to find an item that has 1% drop. you have 50% item stat. That chance to find the item is now only 1.5%
In February, the unemployment rate remained constant at 8.3% … it dropped in March to 8.2%.
After doing a lot of googling, we decided on a restaurant called Gator's Cafe & Saloon because it advertised a Ladies' Night special and the kitchen was open until 10. Me being the good celebrator that I am got the reuben sandwich with fries. This was one of the top 3 reubens I've ever had, and trust me I've had my fair share. I seriously gobbled it up in probably 7 minutes and was licking my fingers for every last morsel. The kitchen closed at 10 and the bar opened up to replace it. The ladies' night special was phenomenal, free domestic drafts, well drinks, and house wine from 9-midnight. And there was a live cover band called Sunburn that had a good sound.
I was in a mood earlier, so I decided to drink. I had a few beers and then I decided to call Jacob. We ended up talking for a while. Jacob is really into me. Really, really into me. The conversation went places that I would have preferred it not to.
Scarf: Vintage
"Where are you from?" he was asked, the question implying an affiliation with news media.
'No, ma'am', he replied. 'I'm riding Silver Arrow in the seventh race, but I sure appreciate your help.'
Well now, here we are one week hence and I see that LMU has again caused a wee kerfuffle. However, this time it is not the university that is displaying fuckwittery but some of its lecturers.
Predicting economic disaster
“Daddy, why are you crying?”
So it was with Roger Ackling's latest exhibition at the Ingleby Gallery in Edinburgh (it's on till the 21st of April if you want to pop along and try it out on your mind). Occupying the entirety of their main room, it is a collection of garden shed odds and ends that have been incised with lines made by a magnifying glass and the sun. I don't think The List website were so convinced (read their review here) but I liked it.
It certainly made an impact and an impression. As did the Magic Rock Brewing Overlords Rich and Stu, whose irreverence and good humour endeared them to those in the room and others watching at home.
Take these pair of beauties for example. I couldn’t walk by, without reaching out and giving them a bit of a cheeky stroke.
1/2 red onion, small slices
#1 Eel River Triple Exultation (Old Ale)
Homer: Ham?
for God’s sake, and it’s a nicely rounded off peak too,
Based on the pattern of O’Reilly, leveraging the long tail is the idea of online business retailers to gain position in the actual market. The online stores are increasing in number and for a store to sell a special product is no longer a good strategy. Distribution and inventory costs of businesses successfully apply to a strategy called Long Tail. This strategy allows organizations to have significant profit out for selling small volumes of many different items to many different customers instead of only selling large volumes to a reduced number of popular items. Given enough variety of products to a large population of customers, and minor stocking and distribution costs, the results in the demand across products increase compared to a single or few variety of products.
800-638-5711 ext.# 4
Here's your next bit. The size of the milk bag is in part due to the ram because the hormones for bag development comes from hormones from the lamb inside. Interesting because I made sure that Renauld came from a good milky mother with a large milk bag. I thought it would mean that he would throw good milky daughters. Maybe it will have some effect but all my ewes make large bags and are very good milky mothers. So the size of lambs a ram throws is not only determined by the genetics of structure but also by the effect the lamb's hormones have on milk production. Fascinating, eh?
For the first time in history, the American Heart Association has defined what it means to have ideal cardiovascular health. By identifying seven health and behavioral factors that impact your health and quality of life, we have given you an assessment tool to measure your own heart health.
His expression clearly said, Hey, Sweetie. You've seen the rest. Now see the best! He practically winked at me. Then he resumed gnawing on the chewie.
Russell’s spiritual others loudly dispute their concerns: “You comprehend, young man, that our energy will dissipate slowly into the mortal realm,” said an elderly man. Another responds: “It’s monotonous here, let’s do this; it would take years for the mortal’s atmosphere to harm us. That’s a wimpy excuse.” A woman’s voice speaks out: “No, they can take care of themselves.” Another voice says: “Being reborn’s our first obligation.” The first voice speaks out again: “If they fight us, we could possibly terminate.” An elderly gruff voice booms out: “Make a deal. Do this and then be reborn.” Woman’s voice: “That’s a gamble, also.” Elderly man replies: “Just want to hang out here and watch second hand adventures?” Russell grins, “Yeah…, right. I prefer you all just quietly watch. I know capable mortals who’ll help me. You know them. They won’t get upset at the sight of me and you know I’ll dodge anything hazardous. Finding these spirits will be easy. This is my assignment. I’ll agree to discuss rebirth after we return.” He pauses and the deep crease across his forehead relaxes and smoothes out; his mouth breaks into a wide grin. He settles down and nods toward his monitor. “We’ll go. I loved working on Missing Person cases when I was a mortal Detective.”
After you advance, the Empress will look much older because she’ll give you the Ultimate Adventurer quest. Also, you’ll get the Echo of Hero skill.
He slammed through the post office doors and screeched to a halt in front of the little box in the wall. With shaking hands he stabbed the key into the slot and there it was – the package from his mom. He’d been tempted to tear it open right there, just in case she’d sent him something different, but he knew it only contained Xanax. Maybe if he didn’t miss so many of the doses he wouldn’t be so forgetful. But the tranquilizer made him tired and clouded his mind. He felt so much better without it, plus he’d been putting the Xanax to a much better use.
5) Home:
Counterfeiters are always one step ahead because they continuously adapt to technological and legislative change. To make up the leeway, there is an ever-increasing number of ongoing policy and legislative initiatives.
Finally, 3 pm, time to head to the hospital! Longest car ride ever! As part of normal hospital procedure, they put me into a triage room to determine if I was really in labor. HA! You’re kidding, right? I wasn’t in there for long. It was obvious to these medical professionals that I was definitely in labor, so they moved me to the waterbirthing suite right away. I was positive for Strep B at 36 weeks, so they got my IV in for the mandatory antibiotics, and checked baby’s heart rate. They proclaimed her to be a “very happy baby” and by 5 pm, I was in the tub!
“I like this Slimming World thing”was what my hubby said to me this afternoon while I was making dinner.
Awaken to the rustle of a sea breeze through coconut palms. Toast the world-famous Seminyak sunsets from your private balcony. Dive into fabled Balinese culture and unique island discoveries from your luxurious Bali resort outpost on the island’s most sought-after stretch of shore.
Aunt Ida kept splendid notes and when it came to recipes, she many times offered suggestions as if it was a work in progress, comparing one technique with another in seeing which worked out the best. In the meatball recipe below, she mentions 'while mixing the meats with the seasonings (and here I know she includes vegetables too) use a cold metal spoon, dipped in ice water and gently fold mixture together.' She forgos of using her hands as the temperature and pressure will pack down the meat and will make it tough after cooking. Only at the very last of shaping does she roll the meatballs into orbs using her hands and then the hands 'should be ice cold.' She also mentions in making the sauce a variation for a brown Creole sauce using a dark roux.
The horizontal section will probably directly produce some downforce while the vertical sections is more likely to act like a turning vane to direct the general airflow outwards.
By now it’s 16h30 and the writer still hasn’t eaten.
He did this twice more while I was there.
No photographs of the lake this time but as we leaned over the bridge and looked into the depths we could see countless frogs around and several enormous carp lazily swimming up and down. Do carp eat frogs we wondered? There were also several pairs of mallards and I am pretty sure they do.
It was the cigarette scenes that really did us in. I frankly wonder how people found time for anything else besides smoking in the 40's and 50's.
J: K said I could go up to our hotel room and read for a while
I have so many ideas I want to write and use within this world of Gifted. Not just with Lucy and her Donovan crowd either, but as a world within a world. I’m hoping you guys dig the idea as much as I do. But I suppose we’ll do this in steps, together. So while I’m working on Book 2 and a couple of other fun things, I’d love it if you went to check out Gifted.
So, I recommend knitting up a pair of dead groundhogs for her feet. Sure, the pattern book calls these “Rabbit” slippers, but with just a few minor alterations, you can provide warm footsies for your child AND have your revenge on weather prognosticating rodents everywhere.
As we were mulling them over, one of the workers pulled
The School Food Trust report said: “The secondary school environment is more complex than primary, and the style of food service makes it more challenging to ensure that pupils are making healthy choices whilst catering for their needs at lunchtime.”
I wasn't sure which of the fabrics to choose for the binding, but I love the green we ended up going with. The solid green frames the other fabrics really nicely, and it turns out that the baby's room has green accents, so we chose the perfect color!
After the 1555 the Hall was renovated and enlarged, Giorgio Vasari painted six new murals over the east and the west walls and Da Vinci half-finished painting was assumed to have been destroyed in the process.
After leaving the store with turkey sandwiches and her father’s favorite iced tea mix, Moody felt apprehensive as she neared her house, saw the front door wide open and heard Simon and Garfunkel once again invoking the darkness that was perpetually her father’s closest companion.
55The virgin's wish without her fears impart,
You many give them your love but not your thoughts.
His story is very powerful so I want to give Patrick the opportunity to share with you next week.
The first track in my writing playlists are the most crucial – they have to set me in my story universe instantly. "Let Go" is Wanderlove's song. The chorus:
The Video acceleration settings fоr thе normal requirements wіll utilize а 3D graphics processor, thіs wіll include а Transform аnd Lighting feature inclusive оf а sixty four megabytes Video Random Access Memory whiсh іѕ sufficient tо transmit high quality graphics. The ultra settings would bе twiсе аs much, uѕіng a low of onе hundred and twenty еіght megabytes. These thrее dimensional graphics cards act aѕ а buffer betwеen thе RAM аnd Video RAM tо produce well screened images wіthіn а quick time frame, nоt noticed bу thе naked eye.
Old time hockey and Eddie Shore may have taken a back seat to the mayhem of the Charlestown Chief's brand of hockey, but Ned Braden (Michael Ontkean) had his own idea of how to fire up the crowd when he performed a strip tease on ice and skated off with the trophy clad in only his skates and his jock strap.
Tiger Street Hotel in Corbett: Tiger Street Hotel in Corbett assures tourists across the world a memorable stay in Corbett. The hotel has been approved by the Indian government. The facilities available in the hotel are tailor made for those who seek to explore forest secrets and break into all new jungle adventure. And last but not least, you have an exclusive view to birds and animals such as tigers, nilgai, chousingas, foxes, porcupines etc.
Unfortunately, I had such a difficult time getting the girls ready to go that we did not get Sweet Pea's hair brushed or put up before leaving the house, and all her crying made her nose run, so she's got snot in her hair that I have to wipe out now before brushing her hair and putting it up. Sigh.
The programme did prove that there were definite benefits if you undertake 3 minutes of HIT a week; for example, the exercise broke down the glucose stored in your body which is necessary to prevent type 2 diabetes and other resulting illnesses. If that is all you want to achieve great…however, I doubt you would lose weight doing 3 minutes of exercise a week, no matter how intense!?!? I would personally suggest doing a little bit more than that!! But keep it intense…intense is good!!
@anonymous: I get (I think) the idea of hating on a wine bar as a symbol of gentrification, but I think you're mixing your haterades with the "go back to Ohio" bit. When I think "wine bar," Ohio is pretty far down my list.
Tattoo my intentions across the streets of time
These folks are very nice and kind and put up with a “I didn’t get a nap so, I am going to drive everyone around me insane” princess!
I decided to leave it without a sentiment, since there are more than a few words surrounding the tower already. Huge emerald bling to top it off.
It is NEVER too late to be what you might have been. (George Eliot)
write as the man who grew up in that
Your tongue, so comforting, so enticing
Here’s to signing off, getting off the couch and getting some groceries so we can eat dinner tonight. It’s gonna be tuna casserole tonight – I think you either love it or hate it. It’s good comfort food for me, and I’ll take the little bits of comfort as I can get them.
1 butler
Chapter 19: Packaging and Deployment
Left unchecked, your arteries – strong, elastic “piping” that ferries blood back to your heart – can grow thick, stiff, and narrowed by fatty plaque build-up, putting vital organs like the brain, heart, and kidneys at risk. And of course, you have to remember that your heart is a muscle – you can only imagine the way this added stress might tax your heart over time, sometimes even to the point of it giving out.
This was one of those meals that came from trying to get rid of a few odds and ends of things and turned into something really delicious. I've actually made this again since because I liked it so much. The best part is that you pretty much just throw everything into the oven and forget about it until the timer goes off. You could use this as a side dish for dinner or brunch or just eat it as a meal for breakfast. Either way, it's filling and hits the spot.
Under the current provisions, the Act would require advertising networks and financial transaction service providers to end relations with foreign domains that were found to point to websites hosting trademarked or copyrighted material unlawfully. This would also include search engines to comply with the act. However, another new provision also encourages advertisers and financial transaction service providers to voluntarily end relations with domains they feel are hosting illegal material. Under the act, Protect IP would grant these service providers protection from any liability for damages inaccurately caused against domains. This provision, which can be extremely helpful to the copyright holders, also opens up a large can of worms. What would be the cost of compliance? In addition, critics argue that because differences in the way the DNS system works around the world, this Act would in effect “fracture” the entire DNS system.
- Schertz Air conditioning repair / Schertz AC repair
PRODUCER: Hi, I'm looking for new writers for a new kids' show, which is sort of a half hour comedy thing, with puppets. Do you have a sample script I could take a look at?
It's not that I hate mornings, I love mornings, I just can't wake up in them. I think I drown every night and lie like a wreck stuck in the grey sludge of the ocean floor. And that's where I want to stay, thank you. A worn out vessel with silver fish stretch marks across my broad side. Leave me be to grow barnacles on my bottom. But no, the morning tug boats dredge me up to ferry the grunting teenagers and growling husband to work. Bugger.
Toro & Osetra Caviar
Cash only!
~here is the next page of the layout, with the basket; I love seeing our products in the magazines; thank you to Heather and to the Editors; let me assure you, your readers love it too~
Secondly, many of the concepts, research and understanding I have is from Sweet Poison by David Gillespie and Sarah Wilson’s Blog. For specific information I have gathered from them refer to their sources directly. I don’t want to rehash everything they say but I am using their experiences as guidance and their research as my backbone. I promise to provide any direct links to thinks I find useful where I can without copyright. If there is anyone else out there like me then I hope the information I provide is useful. For a proper understanding of what I am trying to do try the Sweet Poison website or their Facebook page. I am not having all out war on every form of sugar just fructose used to artificially sweeten things like sweet chilli sauce that don’t need it. For a proper introduction to what this is all about get David Gillespie’s book. (If your interested is piqued).
*deliver those cupcakes
There were suburbs of Phoenix with nearly that many people! Wei bemoaned the loss of his former command.
(1 Peter 2:2-3)The land of Israel was, and is, a land flowing with milk and honey. But it was so only because God dwelt there and spoke his word to Israel in that place—a word which eventually spread to the rest of the world.
Fall is literally around the corner, so it's time for me to update my wardrobe with some fall pieces to get me through the season. While browsing some of my favorite sites, I stumbled upon these Fabio Rusconi shoes and knew that I had to have them for the fall season. They are such a fun and interesting way to play upon the leopard "trend" (I say "trend" because many have said that leopard is a passing trend, but it's been holding it's on for over a decade now so I don't really consider it a trend. I think of it as more of a staple when done correctly).
Yay it's finally Friday! I am on duty all weekend...but alas it's still Friday!! I love Fridays because it means the weekend is here...but it also means it's time for Unity's Friends with Flair every Friday you can create a card or comment on all of the other amazing cards that others have posted in order to win Unity stamps--ummmm hello does it get any better than that?!?! I think not :) Stamping and Free Stamps...hello sign me up!
Where I will be free.
No. 9: Pulse Asia making public a survey saying the number of hungry citizens has dropped
Quantity is assessed in terms of the
Starring: Jeffrey Dean Morgan, Zoe Saldana, Chris Evans, Idris Elba, Jason Patric
An era of Whitehall control has ended with a historic shift in power back to local people, as the Localism Bill becomes law.
So I thought I'd just post some pictures of things you all missed while I was, um, NOT blogging.
groundwork? Earn it?
“It’s like, say, Barnes & Noble saying we shouldn’t have a public library system because it stops private sector investment,” said Kelli Kukura, the League’s director of governmental affairs. “The bottom line is they need to get busy working on this or get out of the way so we can serve our citizens.”
Seawater?
What Makes A Chanel Watch?
Hubby: HOW much did all that COST?
I am a huge fan of the 6 pack size for lunches, field coolers for Hunting Season, and.......hauling around breast milk. Yep, I said it. And if you order the camo one nobody knows there is breast milk in there. They think you are hauling around dove breasts. Looking for something a little more girly? They monogram!
Luckily, I curbed my spending somewhat on surfaces ... and I feel as if my skill has finally caught up with my confidence - or vice versa!LOL
“Of course it’s possible,” he said. “The Dutch artist was not overpaid, and the temptation to reproduce a masterpiece like this must have been great. But I doubt if Schalcken would have done it. I suggest, Mr. Evans, that you are the possessor of an excellent copy.”
“I’ve seen him order it. Get one with extra pepperoni too. That’s for me.” Mike flashed a smile at Piper and disappeared around the corner of 192nd Street.
“It’s Saturday, love,” I replied a second after tapping the brake in semiautomatic response to the yellow-trimmed sign, sans lights flashing. By the time she redefined the information as “Birchwood, 30 mph” (48 kph for our international guests), I was rounding a curve, the end of which revealed two county sheriff patrol cruisers parked in front of a boarded up something or other in that opposite vis-à-vis position convenient for conversation and the sharing of donuts and/or stashes of evidence for planting. The adrenaline surged my pulse enough to bug the eyes slightly while my throat did its little tourniquet act. They’re just hanging out, I unconvincingly told myself just a few seconds before the one that had been facing me flung a sprightly U-turn and engaged his blue light specials (didn’t I blog about that just a short time ago? Wow, I must be psychic, friends).
This is a typical out-of-the-body memory, because I remember running and then I saw the scene from outside and above, Granny jumping into the river with her clothes on, a light silk dress with small flowers, groping frantically in the water below the floating white cap.
Malcolm Jefferson (Malton, North Yorkshire)
The NUMBER ONE thing you have to know and remind yourself when making your stays is that the empire waistline is KEY. You mess with that, you will have problems. Your garments are designed to fit around this elevated waistline which runs directly under the base of your bust, and if you are not getting the proper lift, or your gussets are too low, your gown’s cut and placing will suffer.
So God does the initiating.
Yep. Negative consequences for the world if you break your NYR. You fail your task(s) and bang, your money/kidneys are gone, your children are no longer safe, George W Bush is wearing a swastika (and no he hasn't gone Buddhist) and running for re-election and all stem-cell research grinds to a mushy halt.
As we are all used to these pricing games, I'm sure no-one will be surprised when in a month they 'drop' the prices again, potentially saving us more money gawd bless 'em!
The Whitechapel Gallery, 77-82 Whitechapel High Street, Whitechapel, London, E1 7QX, 020 7334 3922
Now waiting for conversation, now Lord my actions follow me, the world does
To me, that’s what a lovely day like this one is all about. The sun is shining, the temperatures are warmer, and I’m in need of a rest — mentally, and every which way.
And in case you follow the rugby here's the match review. The whole weekend was a wonderful experience and made even more enjoyable because hubby and I do follow the rugby (Marty used to play rugby).
The Alberta Tories and their media allies have tried to counter this momentum with another potent force: fear.
Jesus is the peace (εἰ¦ρή¦νη ey-rey-ney) between Jews and Gentiles; no longer is there a physical or spiritual dividing wall (ραγ¦μοῦ frahg-moo) between us. Jesus Himself brought this end of strife between Jews and Gentiles. The previous verses covered many of the issues which divided Jews and Gentiles those many years ago. It began as obedience to the laws of God that the Jews would be separate from all the tribes around them. The Jews had the law, the Word of God, the covenant, ceremonial standards, the priesthood, and their King was God. Even in the building of the Temple, there was a wall that divided the places that Jews could go, and the places that the Gentiles could go. This wall is a representation or a picture of the hostility and the division between Jews and Gentiles. They were divided, two people with a spiritual and cultural division. For the Jews, this went way to far, turning eventually into hate and self righteous pride towards even their own people. For example, the Pharisees looked down on other Jews who did not live up to their standards. For the Gentiles, there was a demonic hatred to wards the Jews which in some places continues to this day. In Christ, however, all those old walls are torn down for those who trust in Him. Jesus Christ Himself is our (Christians) peace that has ended hostility between Jews and Gentiles, indeed, between all groups of people. When we are in Christ, we are called to love one another, because in Christ we are one body.
Ryan McRyhew is a co-founder of the Laser Palace label and member of Hideous Men and Bdrmppl, He started the Thug Entrancer project to deal with the dislocation of moving from Denver to Chicago, reviving the ageless art of transforming dark times into positive vibes. He does this by finessing a battery of analog electronics to make hand-made techno, folk music for replicants.
In honor of it being more than a year since any of us last posted, I thought I'd do a post. Also because I just got all my recipes typed up and saved onto my computer. And that makes it a whole lot easier to make a recipe blog. :) It has been forever since I even thought about making a post on here though. Does anyone even look at this blog anymore, I wonder? Ok, here ya go -- it is a recipe I got from my Kraft Foods magazine and it's actually so good. We love it. Fast, simple & still tasty. Hope you enjoy it.
Ah, the exotic islands of the South Pacific…where dusky babes bare their bosoms to the briny breezes. Yeah, yeah, I know I watched too many seafaring sagas in my youth, and these days the likely first Google search hit is the Petronas Towers in Kuala Lumpur.
But, in a larger sense, we can not dedicate -- we can not consecrate -- we can not hallow -- this ground. The brave men, living and dead, who struggled here, have consecrated it, far above our poor power to add or detract. The world will little note, nor long remember what we say here, but it can never forget what they did here. It is for us the living, rather, to be dedicated here to the unfinished work which they who fought here have thus far so nobly advanced. It is rather for us to be here dedicated to the great task remaining before us -- that from these honored dead we take increased devotion to that cause for which they gave the last full measure of devotion -- that we here highly resolve that these dead shall not have died in vain -- that this nation, under God, shall have a new birth of freedom -- and that government of the people, by the people, for the people, shall not perish from the earth.
2 tsp cinnamon
3) What is your favorite thing to paint? Why?
I was reminded of Chagall as I watched, yet again, Notting Hill this afternoon. Art is so often fascinating, in the way that books and poetry can be. How one person perceives it may be completely different to another persons way. But let me give three of the possibilities in understanding which come to my mind when I look upon Chagall’s work.
White anchovies are our other side of choice, delicate fillets that are deliciously firm and salty.
So, now you're humming the tune, right? and wondering (because this IS a pg post), what's the hook?
■ Finally get started on my career (after my degree I only worked for 3 years before having a 6 year gap for babies!!)
Keds. Gingham with fruit. Because the bohemian side loves a sunny summer day, when maybe you do not much of anything. (I tried them on; they run wide, and I'm a standard B.) Price, $45.
Looking over a draft of a short piece I did for my Open University course, I thought I'd post it because it's my birthday. I might even have some cake.
So here are the rules:
Every so often, these people, the ones bashing others over the head with the good book....they should take a second to actually read it.
I'll say here I like very much the approach to lists, which is the same as in the earlier documents. Rather than fixed units, true for every army, the supplement gives us those used in these particular cases, and if we want to see them as standards we can, but can equally well use the construction rules in the full ruleset to create our own takes.
By The Cute and Girly is a challenge for ALL types of crafts, from paper crafts to cross stitch, and everything in between, so we are looking for all types of crafters.
It's my twins' birthday next thursday and this will go over the door.
Publishers' Desk boasts huge lists of publishers and agents--but these aren't especially helpful, either (the implication, of course, is that these publishers and agents actually use Publishers' Desk, but the lists look to me more like a gigantic pile of names harvested from the Internet). For one thing, there are fee-chargers. In the list of publishers, I spotted three vanity publishers--A Better Be Write Publishing, Aberdeen Bay, and American Book Publishing--before I even got out of the A's (Publishers' Desk's FAQ acknowledges the probability that "subsidy" publishers will use the site--always a risk with display sites). Ditto for the agency list, where I found names such as Charlotte Gusay (a $35 reading fee) and the delightfully professional Eddie Kritzer, who charges a $600 upfront marketing fee.
Many models are presented in one place to test their efficiency and overall support from the public. This goes for legislation at both a state and federal level and also includes the testing of things like the TSA scanners, which were then rolled out nation wide. We also saw the remote deleting of all of George Orwell’s books by amazon.
because of coupons all of it was $15.79!
But for this post I thought I would share with you my polymer clay puppies and my kaleidescope of Butterflies. I suppose this could be used on the top of a birthday cake or perhaps a paperweight to give your desk a bit of colour. For the moment this is going to sit on the coffee table in the conservatory and then when we do eventually get a bit of sun in the North East it will catch the colours shimmering on the Butterflies. Another idea would be to pop them into your plant pots along with your plants to brighten them up.
I was given a red racing bike for Christmas once that my parents got second hand from some friends down the road. I don’t think it was too expensive, regardless I loved that bike and it was in great condition. I remember going out round the block on Christmas morning while my Mum put the turkey in the oven. I had it for years until I out grew it, and even then I wouldn’t let it go willingly.
“Hey, do you want to watch something?”
"Ah Bless." I thought to myself and thought back to those days when we used to ring Annie Lennox's dad's doorbell and run away... "Little tykes"
Biggi Veira, you worked with GusGus from the very beginning in the 90ies. What is the difference between working in a team rather than in a collective?
Discussing the ability of the US to garner 30 medals in a major championship, I was surprised to learn that the coaches of our medal winners do not receive stipends from USATF - a situation that should be rectified in my opinion as prior to the change to the Logan administration stipends WERE paid to coaches. Coaches were paid upwards of $2,000 if their athletes won medals at the Games - lesser amounts if they coached athletes ranked in the Top 10. While it is discretionary, it would seem to be a logical move to provide assistance to those most responsible for the development and performances of our athletes. Something that I would hope the current administration would reconsider.
This ornament started out as a plain frosted glass globe. I sprayed it with Dazzling Diamonds Glimmer Mist to give it an all over glimmer. Then I poured green Glimmer Glaze on the top and let it drip down the sides. After the glaze dried, I poured on a second coat of green glaze, and while the second coat was wet, I added some crystal snow glitter.
“Okay, Michael, now it’s your turn. From me to you.”
There's a door to somewhere else - I open it.
I won’t say it was exactly horrible, but next time I’ll stick to the very tasty lime…
She loved her class, by the way. I didn't. The gym it was in was split in half and the other side had a basketball game going on. A very LOUD basketball game, complete with cheers, buzzers, etc. You couldn't hear a thing going on in the ballet class, not even the music coming out of the huge speakers. I complained and they told me they had limited capacity and this was all they could do. No other rooms available. Well here's a thought: don't schedule basketball and ballet at the same time!! It's hard enough for 3 and 4 year olds to listen in a quiet setting, and much harder when there is a roaring basketball game five feet away...
What ignites you? Rocks your tube socks? Places you into action without immediate fear?
Our little dog, Binx, had puppies about five weeks ago. Here are a few more recent pictures.
I am fascinated by artists and the creative process. Is a designer an artist? not quite, I would never be conceded to the point of viewing myself as an artist. However, I feel that the source of great design comes from the core of one's creativity and emotions.
It's a green place in spring - hedges of hazel, frothy hawthorn and twining honeysuckle, verges of primroses, stitchwort and violet line narrow lanes and tracks. And lambs. And bird song. And blossom. The gold of summer's harvest becomes russet as the valley's many trees turn orange then red. Autumn brings brown ploughland. Hardly inspiring, but each thing in its turn.) Winter brings a strange melancholy when fog hugs the valley bottom - exhilaration too when an exquisite hoar frost catches morning's first light.
And THAT is something that we currently have no program/system in place to handle – which in my humble opinion is a big reason why we have run in place for so long, and why the rest of the world has “caught up”.
I, personally, absolutely love court room dramas. If I had it to do all over again I would be a lawyer. I love the court room board game. Two players having to convince the jury to see their point of view while following the rules that the referee (The Judge) enforces. This one is powerful. Sure they give the ending away with the scene right before the famous “you can’t handle the truth” scene. But it doesn’t give away how it ends. You can’t deny the power of Jack Nicholson in this one and if he had a couple more scenes I believe he would have received the Oscar he was nominated for in this film. You should not ignore this film.
You might feel the revulsion that idea provokes right now. Wrong needs to be made right, or at least clearly labeled AS wrong and punished as such. Heinous things as child abuse, extortion, kidnapping, genocide, and rape should never go unanswered. Neither should what we might consider “lesser” sins – lying, gossip, manipulation, selfishness, lust. The reason you and I instinctively feel that way is because we are made in God’s image, and God is just. He must make the wrong right. He must call the guilty to account.
Combine the sauce ingredients and let set in the fridge a few hours.
Here is the deal-e-o: today I was at McDonk's playland with Ella. Friday I was at the mother-trucking beach with the kids. Sunday I was at a waterpark with the kids. I've been to the indoor playland. I've been to the library, bored to tears as the kids played with the germ-coated library toys, or looked at the fountain in the adult section for so long I wanted to weep. I've been to the splash pad. I've been to the public pool. I went for the ice-cream/petting zoo combo, and endured MUCHOS whining from the boy while I spent like TWO MINUTES enjoying the duck pond section (I love you ducks! You're so cute and brainless and charming). I went on the FAMILY VACATION. We went to a carnival. I rode on poop-my-pants scary waterslides. I floated around in the human soup known as the wave pool for ages.
(Gifts from the Magi to Jesus)
Episode 2 "Machetes Up Top",
Anyway, what I wanted to share today is a great discovery I made on the internet. As I started out again, I mainly did cardio. Running, bicycling, running and bicycling. Quite boring. I went through some fitness sites, most of which just try to sell some fat loss pills, drinks, shakes and a lot of other unnecessary stuff. But luckily I found Bodyrock.tv, the so called home workout movement. Great site. Most of all because what they say and do makes sense. Second because they really give you something concrete to work with: a daily video of a great workout, using mainly body weight exercises.
NIKITA (8:00-9:00 p.m.) and SUPERNATURAL (9:00-10:00 p.m.) finish their seasons on Friday, May 18.
Yet isn’t there something slightly inhuman about a conversation where meaning is divorced from intention? Where the recipient of a text message interprets that message without the benefit of context, tone, or expression? Yes, text messages attempt to convey the spontaneity and improvisation of regular speech. However, texts are not democratic; texts are control. Texts allow the sender to control the interaction (although not the interpretation) and to participate in a communication at his own pace.
Serve with roti, parathas or even appam and idiappam.
Article 150
Apps and games
* Top al-Qaida fundraiser Abdurahman Alamoudi, a one-time CAIR director now serving 23 years in federal prison for terrorism.
Mahjong Memory
7. The iPhone is another repetition of what is by now clearly visible as the formula: copy the idea, connect it up with something usually separate, make it really work, make it simple to understand and beautiful to use. Also:
The author goes on to discuss that the paralytic man probably felt that if ONLY Jesus could allow him to walk again (which he did), that he would have everything. He would be the happiest man alive and would never complain. I can even relate to that. There have been literally hundreds of days in my life where I have prayed in that manner… “God if you would just heal the muscles in my eyes.. I would be beautiful and people would not judge me and I could achieve all my dreams to be a broadcaster on camera.. and so forth” Haven’t you prayed that way too?
Last Week’s Question:
Determined to drive his reluctant family across country to Wally World in their metallic pea Wagon Queen Family Truckster, Chevy Chase as Clark Griswold is arguably at his funniest in National Lampoon’s Vacation. Chase’s ability for slapstick and physical comedy in practically every scene has rarely been matched in any other comedic film performance. Despite Chase’s screen dominance, director Harold Ramis somehow provides the supporting cast with the opportunity to shine in a number of terrifically funny performances. The movie is nicely held together with the use of a memorable soundtrack and some oddly hilarious musical numbers – all of which make Vacation one of the best comedies of the 1980s (Klaus Ming September 2010).
In case you missed lesson 1 or 2, I’ve posted both of them on my blog:
For one sweet strain of silence,
That one was much discussed in classes on socialist organizations, and it is also true for other conflicts from civil wars to revolutionary overthrows to such things as simple elections. There is a deep and virulent strain of Islam that has never been tempered by a conflict that has so sickened its participants that they swear away from marrying the Mosque and State together. That has helped such organizations to at least retain some cohesive internal system, but that system cannot address the myriads of bureaucrats necessary to run it. If al Qaeda has had the bureaucratic disease spread to them, then they had to have it from somewhere else. Many of the examples of Western Communist terror organizations points to a good set of roots in that culture. Another set is put in place by the Muslim Brotherhood and its affiliation with the NSDAP of Germany in the 1930's which brought its own brand of efficient bureaucracy with it to emulate. That system can be one of heartless and inhuman efficiency, to say the least. And when the bureaucracy begins to re-order an organization to fit its desires and it is heartless, then the original causes the organization held begin to wane as the bureaucracy takes over to its own ends. For now those ends still include the terrorist vision of OBL and the other founders of the organization, but at some point the last link to that past will be lost in the form of Zawahiri, and then the organization will be run by its bureaucrats. So long as external operational pressure is kept up, al Qaeda is in a death spiral of bureaucracy: we won't destroy it, as such, so much as it will run out of funds to keep the bureaucrats paid.
Now, this had a chance to be a perfect symbiotic relationship. But people got greedy. And despite the bigoted stereotype that "Jews are greedy" we'll see that's about the exact opposite of the situation. See, the economy might be generally going up, but that doesn't mean everything is a sure thing. Crops can fail, goods can be stolen, people can just mismanage their investments. When Christians borrowed money from Jews, and when a lot of them did, or just very powerful ones did, what happens if the borrowers are unable, or just unwilling to pay the money back? Today the bank takes your house away from you. Back then? Jews had no real political power. Often what happened was Christians called for a 'Pogrom': a Church-Sanctioned persecution of Jews: They'd go through their district, drag them from their homes and force them under threat to convert to Christianity. Don't? We will probably kill you or drive you out (We don't have to pay our loan!) if you do? (hey! you're not a Usurer are you? We don't have to pay our loan!). See?
I haven’t listened to Fortgang before. Her throaty female voice is very good for Gin but unfortunately she makes breathless voices for many of the males, especially the main love interest. It’s pretty strange to listen to the dialog with Fortgang’s breathless, seductive voice and the hear a tag “he growled”.
Well, I hope you won't get bored with yet, another chiffon cake post! I can't help but to share with you this not-so-clear image of the cake baking in the oven. The cake ballooned as the clock ticked away...it made my ego swell at the same rate as I watched the cake rose and bloomed nicely.
The application content spans from Maine’s Acadia to Utah’s Zion, National Parks and features information on thousands of points of interest, all tagged with GPS coordinates and complemented by recommendations from National Geographic editors. It includes global and interactive maps enable filtering by activity and seasonality, and travelers can share experiences via Facebook, Twitter and email while collecting custom-designed stamps for each park they visit.
"Some clients would rather not know about looming IP problems, because they say 'If we know about this we might be looking at increased damages for willful infringement.' But they might have a false sense of security. They can be put on notice simply by a competitor appropriately marking a product," explains Heinze, who also authors the blog, "I/P Updates," a member of ALM's Law.com Blog Network.
And I whispered "Whsst! witch-hare,"
The Fed can’t lower interest rates below the zero they are at today. The more money the Fed prints, the greater the risk of inflation, and the higher long-term interest rates will eventually move, stifling the economy.
Canada’s Role in the World: Harper is the sole reason that for the first time ever, Canada is not on the UN Security Council. Why? His foreign policies. Peacekeeping, good-hearted Canada is no longer trusted by the UN. We also have been condemned for our environmental policies, and Harper wants to kill funding to Planned Parenthood for another first – hindering their care overseas – because of abortions. Does it feel American up in here?
Isles off Rizzoli & Isles – love that the character has both extreme logic and an extreme sense of fashion plus she’s a strong independent woman.
As you can tell, today is one of those days where I’m totally uninspired and am just dressed for comfort. I should seriously stop wearing this top because it’s so unflattering… BUT I CAN’T! It’s just too comfortable!
The autumn colour "before"
This is Jenny´s sister Betty from Paraguay posting. She is having internet problems and asked me to post her update for her, because she can´t log in today. So from China to Paraguay to the US this post is really very international. :) How cool is that?
As stated in our current policy and to avoid wasting paper, we do not send mail regularly. You will generally only receive future letters from us under the following circumstances:
MACON
We are all looking forward to summertime here in Belgium! We really need sunshine! It is still too cold for the time of the year!
The dimension for the gift card are 6X4. Score at 1/2" and 2 1/2" fold and tape closed.
As well as working with “Clubnet”, the team are working with other similar schemes designed to promote “social inclusion”. One such project is the “West End Community Circle”. The cirle is a chance to make some community conncections with other people in a warm, welcoming and positive space.
Positive Aspects of a Vegetarian Diet
The Ice Storm is worth watching but it’s hard not comparing it to its suburban counterpart American Beauty, which came out two years later and managed to go deeper with its complexity of characters.
So this “weekend” has been “pas mal”. Still lots to do. Change the diapers, find a paper bag thing for the vac and map out the stuff I’ll get professional help for (engine pipes and tubes/service, zincs, electrics, some hull fillings etc).
Play.
school starts next monday for us, and my life as i know it, is about to change dramatically.
On the first try, I made one marshmallow and spaghetti “house” ahead of time and showed the children my sample. Then I got out my document camera and made a cube underneath it so that everyone could see what I was doing and how I did it. We talked about how to make it sturdier, and how builders make houses so that they will stay up. (It’s the diagonal posts in the structure that make it sturdy!) Once I added some diagonal spaghetti noodles to my cube, the whole thing stayed up straight and tall with no problem. Then we counted how many marshmallows we needed to make a cube, and discovered that we only needed eight. I think that this is a good precursor for them to start counting the vertices (corners) in the geometric solids, which I know is something that they will have to be able to do in the higher grades. Despite the fact that I modeled how to make a cube, I told them that they could explore the materials and make anything that they wanted. When they were finished, I gave them a lunch bag with their name on it so that they could save their structures and eat them at recess or lunch. It's also worth mentioning that this project creates a BIG mess, and you WILL need a broom to clean up all of those broken spaghetti noodles that land on the floor! It really looked like a bomb with dried spaghetti inside of it exploded inside my classroom around the table for this project!
This is God’s Kingdom
i made this painting just before christmas. i was in experimentation mode, trying not to be attached, and working at being playful. before it looked like the above, it looked like this (a background that i had sitting around for nearly a year):
I think all of these are doable. I just wonder how doable they are when you are working full-time AND pregnant.
Our Christmas will be very quiet, just the hubby and his folks. There are family members we wish were closer, but they are close in our minds and in our hearts.
I planted 60 acres of radish and managed to get the seed rate wrong, (despite hours of work setting the drill) and I got mixed up on the field size and put twice as much fertilizer in as needed. At $6 and something a gallon you don't want to be 100 gallons off. Couldn't pump it back into tank as it had an additive which I later realized I am not authorized to apply.
(Student had no answer.)
I double stamped and embossed her tutu and added rhinestones for some bling :)
Records — Tappan Zee 9-0.
if thats where
This is the card I made for my daughter's first birthday last week. I used a lot of Copic stuff on it, though at first you probably can't tell.
Now, here is the good news! I believe I have found a site that will sell gigantic lockets like this (actually, exactly like that one) at a pretty good price. (If you look at the tutorial, this locket I found here was $5, not exactly inexpensive.) Now, here is the catch. The site I found is a wholesale site, meaning I have to buy a crapload (exact amount) of them and take on a pretty big financial risk in order to get them at a good price. Kinda scary for a tiny business owner like me!
A mystical ride
(Photos by Jonathan Barkey)
The term 'reviewer', just like 'publisher' or 'editor' comes with years of skill, practice and punishment. They're terms you earn the right to call yourself when you prove it. Emailing the subject alerting them to your shonky work and expecting thanks isn't called 'reviewing', it's called being a hack.
There has been no greater loneliness than that borne by the Lord Jesus Christ, for He was bearing the sin of the world. The divine Father could not look upon such sin as Christ bore it for you and me.
It will not be for the first time yet it will be new…but, as Deleuze himself has said,
Premise
You may have mentioned this on your website before, but I flipped open my Parenting (School Years) magazine and saw your face and name on the GoodNites advertisement for their new LiteNights campaign. I'll have to check out that site to read more about it (it's an issue 2 of my kids struggle with). You don't have to name names, but have any of your kids had night-time issues with staying dry??
So all of you probably remember when I posted about how my mom joined the Disney Vacation Club and used her membership to book a hotel room for Matt and I for the honeymoon at no charge to us.
But why hate so hard? Why not embrace love and forgiveness and peace the way all the great spiritual masters suggest? It’s easy. It all comes down to survival. I hate what hurts me, what threatens my well-being, my existence.
Soudien called for the UCT community to redouble its efforts to promote human rights and to publically reject the idea of reacting violently to those with different views.
Santorum was helped by the focus, in the opening 45 minutes, on economic and fiscal issues. It allowed him to speak like a reasonable conservative, about debt and Social Security and the evil of the Wall St. bailout, without scaring independent voters with his pronounced views on faith, sex and reproductive freedom…. – National Journal, 2-22-12
The outbound scenery was impressive. Suburbs are randomly scattered throughout the vast vicinity of sand. Good luck to anyone who ever decides to air raid the UAE! The houses seem to camouflage into the sand. This giving the impression that the houses and fences are made of sand - to blend in with the sand. It was so bright I had to wear sun-glasses just to look out the plane window. I was disappointed I didn’t spot a camel. But, the place intrigues me that much that I will definitely be back for further exploration… That and I really want to go to Ferrari world!
Communication remains the key to everything we do, and so we have been careful to cover all the bases to keep you informed. We have asked the Galactic Federation to make itself fully known to you after disclosure is announced, and have asked the Agarthans to do likewise. Each of you needs to acquire full knowledge of what is happening and why, and where it is all headed. It is equally important for us to have feedback from you regarding this sudden flurry of events to hit your societies. We, the Ascended Masters, intend to appear and heal and bless all of you even before the mass landings. We sincerely ask for your feelings on these matters as the time has come to change how you interact with Heaven. You are each a sacred physical angel. You need to learn about your divine lineage and the sacred Orders you are a part of. Ponder on these matters, as Heaven is now returning in force to your world!
Or imagine you’re one of the 15%. Your children are still young, you’re still working your way up the corporate ladder, you have your whole life in front of you. And one day you’re cooking dinner, but your hand won’t work. . .
Goose Island Christmas Ale (Reviewed by JM)—This was the first beer up for review in the 2007 Search for the Best Christmas Ale. Initial thoughts: this ale is definitely a keeper, a nice "middle-of-the-road" beverage that goes well with winding down on a cold winter's eve. It didn't knock my socks off, but it was certainly pleasant.
And sealed with a rusty pin,
But God starts by giving me a much bigger picture. A picture of what He is doing: Father, Son, Spirit, as He gives in rich variety to his people, through our different individual works, service and gifts. God is the Giving God. This is the Trinitarian God actively at work amongst his people; the loving community of the God-head producing the tools and energies needed for the local church to work and bestowing them to us through each other.
And, this time, I stumbled across a leaflet there, describing something called the "One Society Many Cultures" conference. It seemed to have a number of prominent speakers, including Red Ken Livingstone, and looked worthy of a quick read and analysis.
I got a nice "rim" on the backgrounds.
Jetta
WASHINGTON – In an interview released Tuesday by the Christian Broadcasting Network, U.S. Representative Paul Ryan (R-WI) told CBN’s David Brody that his Catholic faith played a large role in the drafting of his budget proposal that passed the House by a party line vote last month. Congressman Ryan is the latest member of Congress, including Democratic Reps. James Clyburn and Jan Schakowsky, to claim a faith-based/moral responsibility or lack thereof in supporting or opposing the budget.
Now there’s a plan, and certainly an answer to (someone’s) prayer: marry the left to ninja super-liberal class-warfare Jesus, hint at civil war, and for good measure, call some conservative Christians not really Christians at all. That should trigger a gush of electoral success.
Yes… you are probably right. Governments of all complexions tend to be persuaded by the *Five millions flies eat shit – ipso facto, shit is good to eat* line of argument.
So here is what we are sending out to USA, UK, Spain and Canada.....
Sorry, will be making two posts today to make up for lost time! I felt it wasn’t right to blog in a bar last night!
She shook her head. “Back to the future?”
Driving along the airfield is a new experience all together. Picture boy-scout camp on steroids. Every square inch of grass was covered with relief and military tents bearing flags from around the world. It was remarkable, really. We found a helpful American Lieutenant who helped us load up some unclaimed drinking water into our truck when certain people weren't looking. “People are getting possessive of their supplies, but the way I figure, its all going out to people in need, and isn’t that the point?” Yes, that’s the way we see it too. The lieutenant informed us the water had been sitting there all week and they were getting ready to use it for showers if not claimed. So we made claim. Hopefully, as more organizations register with the UN and get on a list for distribution, less supplies will sit baking in the sun and more will get placed into the hands of those whose life depends on them.
I would much rather have seen Xander killed, as he was even more of an irksome douchebag this season. When they paired him off with Cordelia, I was hopeful at least that this would get him out of Willow's and Buffy's hair, but no--it only gave him one more girl toward whom he could act like a totally petulant, passive-aggressive asshole. His despicable confession to Willow that he "loves" her while a) she's happily involved with someone else, b) she's fucking COMATOSE, and c) he's supposedly involved with someone himself, made me really want to see him get curb-stomped by someone . . . anyone!
I set up the game and Becky started playing. She karate-chopped fish on my iPod like a pro. She swung left, she swung right, and she occasionally zig-zagged. We were both surprised then, when the doctor said, “we’re done”. Really! OMG! Becky made it through 20+ injections without a sound! I was ecstatic, and I was also very proud of my daughter.
One can only imagine that it must have been a traumatic experience for the two workers as well. So this is yet another example set by the Marxists in charge. While they are supposedly providing for the poor (read enriching themselves), they couldn’t give a rat’s bum who is the victim, as long as it isn’t them.
The idea of course is that my proposal is that to be creative we have to be both scientist and artist. We need to be able to embrace both logic and chaos, both critical and possibility thinking.
"No of course he does."
But I had some fantastic times with that car. You see the hubcap on the back left tire? That's the only hubcap left. One was lost on Highway 240 in Memphis about five minutes after hitting the road for a concert in Atlanta. Another was lost in the parking garage at University of Memphis my freshman year. And the third...I have no idea what happened to it.
Greys - Cool Grey 1, 2, 3, 4, 5
A small team conducted the helicopter raid on the compound. An official called it a complex operation, noting that the compound was a virtual fortress -– built in 2006 with high walls, razor wire and other defense features. Its suburban location and proximity to Islamabad complicated the operation, the official said.
- Concept Questions & Peer Instruction: focus on single concept, multiple choice, more than one plausible answer (using electronic poll system to get responses)
Of a year once long ago
Happy new year, reader!
Taking a long drag from his cigar, he hacked phlegm worthy of The Smithsonian into the over-brimming wastebasket and wiped the tar from his tongue.
I walk through the forest, seeking to comfort that poor soul.
If they have fallen into one of these traps, or any others for that matter, they need to make some conscious changes to the way they operate. Providing the leader has the self-discipline to continuously review their own evolving behaviour they can move forward on their own but this could well be when they want to work with a coach.
Now this also means that we're going to be using scaled measurements here - I gotta do it in school, so might as well make it a habit of doing in real life! So bust out your digital scales!
2. It is a truth universally acknowledged, that a single man in possession of a good fortune, must be in want of a wife.
Bathtub Gin – 43.4%
I no longer have the time between work, graduate school, wedding planning and life to keep this blog going. Not to mention I've just lost the interest in it!
I wish that I didn’t have to go through all the unnecessary paths trying to fit into society, when knowing what I already want. To at least give it a try, and not having regrets at all, instead of being suppressed and thrown to find out if I could possibly be a doctor, a lawyer, or a businesswoman.
The angry crowd then surrounded the policemen but volunteers from PKR’s Jingga 13 formed a human shield around the officers, saying “don’t blame them, it’s not their fault.”
Oh, P.S., I got my sewing done as well. I had already pieced the extra blocks and I just needed to joing them together. The next challenge is to quilt it. Something else that's new to learn!
Today....I can testify that God answers prayers and blesses beyond our wildest dreams.
Do you prefer dinner at home, take out, or eat in a restaurant? Most days, I prefer dinner at home.....of course, it doesn't hurt if someone else did the cooking :)
“Why am I the only one who has that dream?”
The premise seemed simple enough, two anonymous bloggers would take a look at my blog and offer me honest feedback. I, in turn, would be required to do the same for two other bloggers. When all of the reviews were finally collected, the hosting blog would send us a link to a private page where we could read this collection of peer reviews.
Dr. Coleman, a veteran of two space missions, has logged over 500 hours in space. “It’s a magical place,” said Dr. Coleman about outer space. “It’s very addictive.”
confirmation update #1 — east of Portland , OR — within the ring right along the border no less… Hail detected… Damaging winds detected in north central Nevada heading towards Boise Idaho ( boise shown in the video below):
But, today I am grateful that nothing bad did happen. I can't be mad, I'm not upset, he's not in trouble; he's very loved, he's receiving lots of attention, and he gets to choose dinner tonight!
In this connection, the Fuehrer has issued the following order:
(the kicker) any lawyer who listens to our programs can earn (free) CLE credit
Smarr is at the academic vanguard of a growing number of tech geeks, fitness fanatics and chronically ill patients who monitor their own bodily functions to an extent previously thought impossible. With the help of sophisticated smartphone apps and fitness equipment, these self-trackers collect data on their heart rates, exercise patterns, sleep rhythms and diet habits.
"Mommy, what are other parts of speech?"
1T ketchup
Well after some time the pilot checked back in to tell us that it was technically on the next leg of the flight, but they were just taking precautions. Then before we knew it we were in the middle of nowhere on the runway and loading up on buses. Then the buses drove for a while and we sat on the buses. Poor Miss Megan needed to go potty, so she kept telling me, and the business peeps all around us just kept trying to talk to her to keep her busy but it wasn't cutting it for her. It was TIME!!! So all of a sudden poor girl pulls down her shorts and chonies. I then realized OMGOSH Megs hold on a minute and pulled up her shorts, gasping as everyone around gasped... I quickly ran to the front of the bus with her and explained to the bus driver... listen my daughter is two and she needs to pee REALLY bad. He says, Sorry, I'm not allowedd to let you guys off the bus. I look out and see all these men in suites and walkie talkies discussing away. I then look down and see the drivers trash. I asked the driver can I use your trash can? He said yes and so I pulled on it to put it near the door to give the poor girl privacy and dignity, but then realized it was stuck. I was thinking, what the heck, why is the trash can stuck? Then I realized its a bus it has to be stuck so I pulled down her pants, sat her on this mini trash and pleaded with Megan to just pee in the trash. She looked up and then realized the ENTIRE bus of business people were staring at her...
This is really exciting. Congratulations!
But our pastor read it this way, "I say to you TODAY "Fear not, for I bring YOU good news of Great Joy, that is for ALL PEOPLE (including you and me). For on THAT DAY in the city of David there has been born for YOU a Savior who is Christ the Lord."
When I get up in the mornings (ok, ok, occasionally when I get up in the afternoon...but generally it's in the mornings), one of the first things I do is check email and Facebook. And the first thing I saw on Facebook today was this video, courtesy of Cake Wrecks Jen who I think must have posted it just for me (just kidding, she doesn't know me but we're secretly geek sisters separated at birth):
1. With a comfortable length of thread, pick up 4 core beads and three outer beads. Slide them down the thread leaving a tail of about 8-10".
If there was ever a Must Have Book about ME CFS, then This Is That Book
I really value your help and I would like to improve at this style :-) I would like you to always tell me as it is ,,, I don't need ,,, fabby card etc etc blah blah ,, lol ,, we can all write those lol :-) I really do appreciate criticism and would never be offended ,, :-) ,,, so please ,,, be as brutal as ya like ,, I can take it :-) ,,, and THANKS !!
Rel took the first track down off the canal path. It had been stepped once, but the paving was starting to disintegrate and the mud made it slick and treacherous. He got both his backpack straps over his shoulders - they pinched at his neck, too tight since his shoulders had started to broaden - and descended with his arms half-extended for balance, leaning slightly backwards.
Mum’s Lounge came about when I felt like I was spending all my time ‘googling’ products and services I needed in my day to day life as a mother. I thought it would be great if there was a site that bought it all together and became a place Mum’s felt like they wanted to retreat to in their down time.
know all about
The dignity of the human race is universal. It knows no boundary to any country, or ocean, north pole or south pole, or equator. The human race in every country has equal amounts of dignity. The northern countries do not have more dignity than the countries south of the equator. There is not more dignity for the human race in the countries east of the prime meredian, than for the human race who happened to settle in the countries to the west of the prime meredian.
How often do you go to the movie theater?
Günter Grass, Germany’s most famous living author and the 1999 recipient of the Nobel Prize in Literature, sparked outrage in Germany on Wednesday with the publication of a poem, “What must be said,” in which he sharply criticizes Israel’s offensive approach towards Iran.
step 2: decide on your pattern (or no pattern)
in the malignant darkness that hastens between us
The Young Lady - (drawling discreetly) ... 0, yes... I ....... at the ...cha...pel... The Young Gentleman - (inaudibly) ... I ... (again inaudibly) ... I The Young Lady - (softly) .0... but you're ... ve....ry... wick...ed...
Of course after hearing that story, I nearly sat on the floor and cried, too. Why did I leave my grandkids to come to England? Why must Noah cry? Why does the separation have to hurt so much at times? What can I do to make it right? At that moment I desperately needed Noah in my arms and still today I ache for his touch. On Easter I will have the joy of holding him and his sister and his cousin. Until then I will just hold on to the bittersweet thought of his disappointment. Poor Noah – poor me!
Mon Desir residents protesting over the highway and its impact on their homes and environment….Not one word from this government!
Another student: Rome, Florida, Sarah Longman (A city, a state, and a person…not quite.)
The publication also reports that there is a prenuptial agreement between the pair.
Paper: Whisper white, summer smooches DSP
And here are the current standings:
by R.S. Bohn
Here is the video I recorded earlier (about 1pm CST on 2/15/2012) — showing the “HAARP ring” that spiked in AL, TN, KY, GA, and SC .
5. I smoke a pack of cigarettes a day - very very bad. I must think about quitting but not just yet.
We had 10 Trail Nerds show up for the trail run last night at WyCo Park. We were going to do 1 or maybe 2 hilly 6.8-mile out-and-backs. We were cruising along pretty good, when we happened upon a body in full camo fatigues lying on the ground on the side of the trail. I actually said "whoa" really loud, and then went back to him. He at first appeared dead, but then he moved and put his finger to his mouth like he was saying "shhh." He then said, "I'm OK" and we resumed running.
Profession animal day cares are pet services used by people who work long hours away from home and cannot see to their needs. These pets may be lonely, high maintenance or need special care. Whatever the situation may be you can drop your beloved friend off at daycare to play, eat and have their needs met. Most of the time these pet cares will be open during regular business hours however, some may offer 24-hour service.
A Jew is a Jew.
Hope you all have a lovely weekend and I'll see you all on Monday!
You’re less than 1, in envy and dissent.
2-Going on and completing our, Mahina Movement’s 1st tour ever successfully! We recently have been asked to go to Palestine for 2 weeks, so we have added Palestine to our tour. We have set out to go to Europe, 5 countries and 8 cities: Dublin, Ireland; London, England; Paris, France; Barcelona and Madrid, Spain; Lisbon, Portugal; Florence and Rome, Italy. (Looks like: making a difference every where we go, being fully funded, and leaving people inspired and empowered.)
“I’ve seen a few of the guys she’s dated … much better,” she said of the groom. “They go so well together, and they both love it out here. I call them to come out to the beach. And they can’t because they’re always here; you can see they love each other.”
In continuing with a discussion about stress, I want to address the profound effect stress has on the adrenal glands, as they control the body’s reaction to stress and trauma.
2 medium zucchini cut into chunks (optional)
helping him or her understand the compromise he or she is making when cost is a family
Tofu marinated in tamari and lemon pepper, cherry tomatoes, parsley and a mix of organic ketchup and sriracha.
The first one is Casa Dragones - a sipping tequila. I was invited to a tasting, and boy was I educated on sipping. The tequila is crystal clear with a very complex nose that changes depending on where you hold the glass. I got deep spice notes with an anise finish that lingers. If you ever get the chance to try it, you'll understand why it is $300. It is nothing like the tequilas that you use for mixing. For the price point, you don't want to mix this one.
When I think about it, Arizona can be a frightening place: temperatures in Phoenix are regularly over 100°F (I'm tempted to bring an umbrella at this point), deadly spiders prowl in the shadows, the most venomous scorpion of the country skitters across the rocks, the snake responsible for the second most deaths in America each year, and the laws of the land are strange and frightening to me. The law about not refusing anyone a glass of water seems pretty reasonable to me, though. And then there's the landscape, a burning world where simply walking in the street can strike you down with heatstroke if you aren't careful. At least I'm used to prickly plant life.
Why is he laughin'? I wondered.
For his work on the Enterprise and tutorial
High-quality horror doesn't rely on surprising you or dressing things up in creeping shadows, and, indeed, everything in Solaris is simply and plainly presented. Yet the terrible mystery of these living ghosts, who persistently reappear in the bedroom even after Kelvin shoots Hari into orbit, is truly awful. You spend much of the film like Kelvin: sweating like mad, too terrified to say anything. It is harrying and harrowing, and it's also darkly comic when the three scientists - Kelvin, Snaut, Sartorius - meet up to lament and try to understand their own private hells. Why? How? and WTF? seem to be the major questions. It's clear that the giant planet-ocean is physically manifesting their thoughts, but why? The purpose, while not apparently sinister, is nonetheless frightening just for being so incomprehensible. It is here that the film makes many a powerful comment on the inappropriateness and laughably arrogant ignorance of man's desire to see and understand the cosmos. Understand the cosmos? We can just hear the murky water laughing at you. *bells tinkle*
First Known Use: circa 1890
Saturday 18th Feb was my 2nd Blogaversary! I had planned a scheduled post (as I was away at the wekend) but Mr Blogger didn't play ball - so annoying when that happens! So I'm posting it myself today!
I mention this because it was difficult to completely ignore. Brendan was one of those people with no sense of that private space, that bubble with a radius of around two to three feet (depending on the situation) we all carry around with us, and therefore invaded it continuously. He was, as the Americans put it, continually “in your face,” with his pale face, greasy black hair and interminable loud declamations. He was always telling you about what he thought and what he was doing – he never showed the slightest interest in what others thought or were doing, unless these were directly related to what was occupying him at the time. But this difficulty in relating to others, achieving empathy, is a typical symptom of people with Asperger’s Syndrome.
***Addendum: A few days after posting this I received a note from one of Paul Miller's reps, who noted a couple of (positive) peculiarities about the Toronto show. First, it was presented with one screen, rather than the standard three; second, it was accompanied by live musicians--also not standard, though Miller was delighted with the results.
Despite the best efforts of the criminals, the pattern their string of home invasions constituted would undoubtedly have been picked up on quickly by whatever computerized criminal database our lords and masters have been busy assembling over the last few years; three home invasions, almost certainly the same perpetrators. Let us pose a question. What are the chances of any given person or vehicle having been in close proximity to any two of the targeted houses at the times they were targeted if they had not been involved in any way with the crime? The answer is clearly very low, and would drop away effectively to zero for three crimes or more. If the police have available to them any means at all of retrospectively scanning, in an admittedly partial fashion, the environs of each crime scene at and around the time the crime was committed, they may well identify persons or vehicle who were present at least twice, and, if they were lucky, all three times. But would these scans take place?
3 return
There has been a growing call for a wall on the U.S. southern border with Mexico. Given the way Mexico has fallen into a state of barbaric anarchy by warring narcotics gangs, including increasing murders of Americans foolish enough to go there, it is a very good idea.
The main complaint I heard was that there was a double standard: transit projects were being asked to justify their funding in ways that most road projects would have completely flopped. And yeah, it's hypocritical *and* idiotic to care about one set of costs but not another.
If you’re going to improve your health, you need to eat healthier foods, it’s that simple. Now, I’m not saying eating bad things is completely off the table. “Cheat days” have been shown to boost your metabolism the following day. And in my experience they have a psychological advantage as well because it gives you something to look forward to.
Another Dangerous Team Obama Idiot: State Official Says Religion Is Not Driving Extremist Violence in Nigeria – After Islamists Slaughter 39 Christians, reads the headline:
Of course these kind of questions do not interest Boris. He wants to know about which way the buses will bend. Wake up Boris. London is burning. If we do not stop this event there will eventually be no sites for tourists to visit. They will have been burned to the grounds by the Carnival goers.
“Instructions will be acceptable.”
So, after consulting with (read this as badgering the hell out of) many of my close, personal, friends (read this as those who couldn’t escape) I’ve made the decision to start this little blog in the hopes that it will either benefit, amuse, or make someone smile. Or kill some time at the Dr’s office. Even if it just does any number of those things for me alone.
We got sweaty and horrible, but it’s so much of a laugh .. and then seeing some of the lads just stood there texting and getting shot .. it’s hilarious. When we got there, there were a group of young lads who have obviously played before, and then a group of hardcore people who went mad when they saw the scoreboard .. we were like, what are we doing with our lives?
Adagio from Symphony No. 7, arr. Cyrill Hynais (c. 1895)
Thami Bolani, chairman of the National Consumer Forum, said it was unfair for paying customers to be charged for illegal connections.
She wrote: 'I'm not convinced that I want to change the status quo. I feel that as I age I've actually gotten more selfish and set in my ways.
Love you very much,
I’ve been very shy about revealing anything I’ve been doing under this heading. The course is coming to an end in two weeks so over the next three posts I’ll dwell on this area more than I have been.
When you have found the right person to form your ‘permanent’ link with, HOLD TIGHT, because it means STRENGTH!
This week's episode was set in the week before Thanksgiving 1966, certainly a moment of great apprehension for many American housewives like the embittered Betty Francis (the artist formerly known as Betty Draper).
7) Acclimatize yourself to the altitude
“No. You know I’ve used them so many times to move and may have to use them again. I’m just going to hang onto them I think. They’re useful.”
One small cut, that is all. Wider.
Newpapers jumped on it as a flip-flop, after he'd criticized a previous governor for wasting the tobacco settlement funds by putting them into the general budget to shore up a (much bigger) deficit.
A cadeau de rupture is a gift offered at the end of a romance. The person delivering the news that "it's over" then gives a gift of adieu. I've searched without success to find the history of the tradition. If you saw the film, Le Divorce, you may recall that Kate Hudson's much older lover gave her a red Hermès sac (I can't recall which model) at the debut of their affair and at the end he offered her a Hermès scarf.
Down south, planting is underway from South Texas to South Carolina. Texas was singled out as the state with the greatest move to cotton, accounting for an extra 600,000 acres of the 10.5 million forecast for 2010. The increase in cotton acres was something farmers have been discussing and optimistic about for months, according to Barry Evans who farms in Kress, Texas on the High Plains.
Not quite ready to leave, we lingered; P. had a cup of coffee while I fondled all the books in the ridiculously comprehensive book store (and finally decided on Dia's excellent new book on our gal Agnes, patron saint of the desert). After an especially toothsome sandwich along the adorable main street in town and a wander down to the river to catch our train -mapled hillsides ablaze in the afternoon light- I thought, hmm, this place is *very* special.
Into Eve’s life jumps Rabbit — a feral street artist, freesteal (a combination of parkour and street art) enthusiast and denizen of the urban demi-monde. As with other Taylor characters (the father in Stanley Park comes to mind) Rabbit’s mental stability is not always a given. A self-identified burnout case from the tech boom, the twenty-six-year-old Rabbit left a promising career in technical engineering on a point of ethics, to wander (quite literally) in the wilderness before insinuating himself into the city’s urban street art scene. Inspired by a comment made by real-life documentarian Werner Herzog, that a culture without adequate images is doomed, Rabbit has found some personal fulfilment with his urban art projects. He has earned a certain fame within this niche for his landscape series “alley-long posters of wildflowers and mountain fields,” a sort of virtual re-imposition of “what might have been if the city were not standing.” Art is, however, by his own admission, only a transition phase for him, fame is not his goal, and he plans to remain in the city only long enough to complete a final, grand artistic statement before retreating to a small property in the country left to him by his deceased parents. Part of the considerable tension in the story derives from the readers uncertainty about Rabbit, his sanity and his ultimate intensions. Eve has become aware of Rabbit’s work on her frequent runs through the city, but it is a chance witness of one of his parkour moves (an unself-conscious, spontaneous expression of creative and harmonious movement within his environment) that brings him to her particular notice, and then, his similarity to her missing brother, that keeps him there.
I rouse myself from lying on Mase's lap (inverted, I know, but his little fingers tugging on my hair is heaven). I ask Helen, "Why are the butterflies bad, baby?"
This was a Frances Lincoln book too, a collection of animal stories from around
I cannot stress that enough. I wish I could put it in italics and bold along with caps, but it’s 10:28 and I’m typing on my Nook, trying to hurry up cause it’s already dieing.
Here are the "Highlights" of my stay in the "all-inclusive resort":
Fritters have existed in Europe since the middle ages. The Scots, and later Scottish immigrants to the southern United States, had a tradition of deep frying chicken in fat, unlike their English counterparts who baked or boiled chicken.
Gov. Charlie Crist personally signed off on his former Republican Party chairman's confidential fundraising role with the state party, according to Jim Greer's attorney, whose allegation contradicts the governor's statement that he "didn't know anything" about the deal now part of a criminal investigation.
But Raymond was more "on the fence" about the vanilla mousseline, which proved problematic for some bakers. It wasn't that Raymond had problems making the mousseline. "All worked out fine." But, although he thought it was "delicious," he also thought it didn't deliver "that hit of vanilla flavor I was looking for." Next time, he promised to use vanilla sugar and a vanilla bean as well as the vanilla extract and hopefully that will give me the vanilla flavor that I am after to pair with this intense chocolate cake."
There are two reasons historians put forward for Crassus’ ill-fated war: greed and jealousy of Julius Caesar and Pompey. There may be some truth to each of these, but in my opinion, not enough to leave the life of Riley he was living. Crassus was one of the most respected, honored elder statesman of Republican Rome. He was known as “the richest man in Rome,” so to me, the greed argument doesn’t fly. As for his generalship, if not for Crassus, Sulla’s overthrow of Marius and Cinna would have failed, and Pompey stole the “glory” of the victory over Spartacus when it was Crassus who deserved the credit. Still, I can see where, as a Roman thing, he might have wanted one more shot at military success. But of those two explanations of why he went to war, he already had plenty of one and a sufficient amount of the other. Plus, he was so old.
In light of this, perhaps refraining from drinking at 10:00am could be a good start. If you are an office worker who enjoys a mid-morning tipple, the chances are that your colleagues will suspect as much. Luckily for you, they are too polite to say anything to your face. Instead they will talk amongst themselves in hushed tones, saving you the embarrassment of having the issue raised in your presence. Good on them.
The number of people displaced by natural disaster and political upheaval is on the rise. In 2008, the figure stood at 42 million for those forcibly uprooted by persecution and conflict, and of this number, 80% were considered to live in developing or ‘third-world’ countries (UNHCR, 2009). And this figure does not take into account those forced from their home by natural disasters; floods, earthquakes, and the like. The US Dept of Homeland Security for example, estimated that more than 800,000 people were made homeless after Hurricane Katrina (Wortham, 2007). Across the globe, humanitarian effort is desperately seeking to find faster and more cost effective methods for housing these populations both during displacement, and also once they return to rebuild their nations, by socially and environmentally sustainable means.
Final image was composed by using "Used Canvas 2" as layer one, set at "Multiply" mode
Great Lakes Brewing Company - Conway's Irish Ale. From my favorite brewer. GLBC produces what I believe to be one of the best seasonal brews out there. I find myself wishing this beer was available all year round, that is why I probably enjoy it so much (knowing I can only get it 4 months out of the year). It is the Winter/Spring ale brewed from January to April. This typical Irish Ale is a beer best enjoyed with your Irish food favorites (potatoes, corned beef, etc). A little history lesson: the beer is named after the grandfather of the founders of GLBC, Patrick Conway, a Cleveland traffic cop who used to work in the same area as the brewery.
PUSHING UP THE SKY: “From acclaimed Native American storyteller Joseph Bruchac comes a collection of seven lively plays for children to perform, each one adapted from a different traditional Native tale. Filled with heroes and tricksters, comedy and drama, these entertaining plays are a wonderful way to bring Native cultures to life for young people. Each play has multiple parts that can be adjusted to suit the size of a particular group and includes simple, informative suggestions for props, scenery, and costumes that children can help to create. Introductory notes and beautiful, detailed illustrations add to young readers' understanding of the seven Native nations whose traditions have inspired the plays.”
The preoccupation with suffering on the part of metaphysicians--is quite naive. "Eternal bliss": psychological nonsense. Brave and creative men never consider pleasure and pain as ultimate values--they are epiphenomena: one must desire both if one is to achieve anything--. That they see the problem of pleasure and pain in the foreground reveals something weary and sick in metaphysicians and religious people. Even morality is so important to them only because they see in it an essential condition for the abolition of suffering.
I pray that as you grow in love the greatest command, your fruit continues to grow in such abundance that the Holy Spirit anoints you with gifts that will help the body of Christ declare all honor, glory and praise to God the Father.
I am a moment’s mist against it hurled.
As I told my wife that, she was looking at me with the one eyebrow much higher than the other, confused, and said, “Then why on earth are you smiling?”
“I could have missed the pain, but I would have had to miss the dance,” The Dance; Tony Arata.
Fermentation:
The conversation went a little something like this:
I think I'll do more than one post so that you are not too overwhelmed :0)
Hello Everyone!! Welcome to Our Daily Bread Design’s Alumni Team’s bi-monthly For the Love Blog Hop. This week the Alumni team along with some of the ODBD designers are featuring a hop for the **For the Love of ODBD Flower sets!** If you've come from Fran's Blog, then you are in the right place, if not, why not start back at the ODBD Blog so you don't miss all the floral goodness!! Check out each link and leave a comment. If you get lost along the way, go to the ODBD blog for the full link list. One of the post is a hop hot spot and a name will be drawn from that list of comments to win a $15 ODBD store gift certificate. So, all you have to do is hop along and see all the creations and leave a little love! You have until Wednesday 9th May at 6pm. The winner will be announced May 10th! Enjoy all the awesome inspiration using For the Love of ODBD Flower sets!
this is my ultra-slow Sunday dish, going out to the wonderfully succulent Karen who does a regular Slow Sunday feature on her blog Lavender and Lovage... my trick with this dish is to do all the prep the night before because then all you have to do is wake up, shuffle downstairs, switch the oven on, bung the chicken in and go back to bed...
And then something amazing happens...
Well, a couple of weeks ago, Pete received an email completely out of the blue from John saying he was doing a little spring cleaning and was looking at selling the Z.
The adjustment period for our family has been a little longer than I anticipated. I feel like we are just now finally hitting our stride and we will be able to establish a schedule for ourselves.
Now you probably think that I’m a loner, and I guess I was, but that doesn’t mean that I was lonely, because I did talk to people. I talked to my classmates as we play jackstones, Chinese jackstones, Chinese garter, agawan base, cops robbers and children (the interactive version), and the like. I would talk to them when we were waiting for the next teacher to come in. I would talk to them when we sit beside each other in the cafeteria tables. I would talk to them in the MMJ at dismissal time.
And I will climb inside your soul,
There was no way she'd do it with Jessica here.
Medway Council’s Environmental Services Team deal with noise nuisance, dog fouling offences and stray dogs on a daily basis, and these events will give people a great chance to gain from expert advice.
If deemed mentally competent, he would face a maximum prison sentence of 21 years or an alternate custody arrangement under which the sentence is prolonged for as long as an inmate is deemed a danger to society.
9:30 pm
I read last year somewhere that at a certain point all the leaves are taken off the plants to promote ripening....I may try it this year....
I am a prisoner here in the name of the King;
Roast all these Ingredients to fine Powder
4 cups baby spinach leaves
Jared
The views from the train were spectacular. The mountains at first felt a lot like Colorado complete with cactus (minus the pine trees), but as we descended more toward Aguas Calientes it feels more like a temperate rain forest. There were several villages along the way with farms for vegetables (I saw a carrot harvest), cows, pigs, goats, and sheep. Jim, of course, fell in love with the border collie he saw overlooking its flock of sheep. Many of the buildings were made with a simple mud/straw brick and thatched roofs.
The path drops down onto the floodplain of the River Arun, narrowing to pass beneath, and sometimes through, the branches of a narrow belt of decaying willows. Mosses, lichens, ferns and fungi are plentiful, along with the first snowdrops I’ve seen so far this year. A glimpse through the trees of three Roe deer, one a pricket with unbranched antlers: seeing me, they slip away virtually silently. I think that’s the last I’ll see of them, but coming upon a gap in the tree belt, I creep towards the field edge to glimpse them again. We stare at each other for some minutes. Their unease at my presence seems to decline until they are content to continuing grazing, albeit nervously. Eventually they trot away across the grass and I watch their powder-puff tails disappear before moving on. Magical.
All of Cinnaholic's products are 100% vegan, made with non-hydrogenated oils and sweetened with evaporated cane juice. Cinnaholic has been featured in many publications including twice in VegNews (there is an interview with Shannon Michelle in the September/October 2010 issue).
by the touch of His vast hand,
Colonial Williamsburg has reinstated the Jefferson Blog. Each week a Jefferson quote is posted on the blog and visitors are encouraged to respond discussing the relevance of his words to our world today. To celebrate the 250th anniversary of his W&M graduation, the quotes are focused around education.
Just say no to canapes, cheese plates, and mini meatballs. High-fat and spicy foods spark indigestion and reflux, keeping you up long past your bedtime, says Carolyn O’Neil, RD, author of The Dish: On Eating Healthy and Being Fabulous!
Rising up to take the place
Founded in 1991, this breeding facility for laboratory monkeys has become a primary target of Israel’s animal rights community. Mazor Farm receives monkeys caught in the wild predominantly from the island of Mauritius. These animals are then bred and the offspring sold to laboratories around the world for use in various types of research. The facility currently holds an estimated 1,500 long tailed macaque monkeys.
Don’t buy drugs on the street
As I checked out at the grocery store the other day, I began to think about how much my consumer habits have changed over the last few years. As I placed my organic produce & dairy products, spices for making MSG-free versions of taco seasoning and onion soup mix, and vinegar for disinfecting my cloth diapers into my re-useable shopping bags, it occurred to me why becoming more natural is a challenge for most people. It can be an incredibly overwhelming process! I didn’t make all these changes overnight. In fact, I very often find myself overwhelmed by all of the not-so-healthy (but more readily available) products. In my experience, it seems that people resistant to “going natural” usually site one of three barriers to doing so – quality, cost, and time – the latter of which prompted this post.
In romance, the 6 is loyal and devoted. A caretaker type, you’re apt to attract partners who you can care for and protect. The key ingredient that must prevail in your relationships is harmony. You don’t function well in stressful relationships. When this happens, there’s a tendency for you to become dominate and control.
(May 1999- May 2007) and
And I have even completed this blog post, which feels in itself like a great big sigh of relief.
The cauliflower has been trickling in--a few heads here and there. They are perfect size to freeze whole. I've gotten 6 of the 9 in that I planted for fall already processed and am waiting on the other 3.
Essentially, Jeff installed a printing press to close the inventory gap with Amazon. The Espresso Book Machine sits in the middle of Harvard Book Store like a hi-tech visitor to an earlier era. A compact digital press, it can print nearly five million titles including Google Books that are in the public domain, as well as out of print titles. We’re talking beautiful, perfect bound paperbacks indistinguishable from books produced by major publishing houses. The Espresso Book Machine can be also used for custom publishing, a growing source of revenue, and customers can order books in the store and on-line.
We’re avoiding or ignoring the real issue.
Joseph Mount, the man behind Metronomy, hails from Totnes in Devon. You’d never have guessed it from the locationless indie-disco of his earlier music, but the third Metronomy album sees him carefully hone in on the charms of southwest England. The market town in question is reimagined as (a different/fantasy) the English Riviera, a romantic destination where magic happens – and it’s apparent from the get-go, with the sound of cawing seagulls opening the album’s first song.
I'm worried it won't last...but I'm hopeful.
I have to give props to this place - it really is great for wheelchairs - ramps and parking, and then a platform that rolls right on to the train. It's bench seats rather than dining car type seats, but we didn't care - we were happy to be able to ride at all! If you want the least amount of people, I recommend the earliest train of the day. But even so, it was fine, there was room for all of us, and we all had fun. The train was loud and rambunctious, full of kids - perfect for us! For those who have wheelchairs in Colorado, I definitely recommend it.
Newcastle East, in New South Wales, up here on the coast.
Close Grip Overhand Pull-Ups 16 26
I do have two more, but that should give you a decent idea of how to begin – the second paragraph describes Ryan and Tori’s exploits as they attempt to get into college and the third paragraph introduces the plot after a crisis erupts. Got an idea of how to do it? Now it’s your turn.
That’s a major part of the story and that is why the oil spill is so large.
Today was supposed to be 90's revival day! Sort of.
Heat a large saute pan over medium heat, then add a tablespoon of olive oil and the shrimp. Cook in one layer, flipping once, until the shrimp is cooked through and pink. Toss with the remaining tablespoon of lemon juice and season with salt.
The Dutch controlled the floods. All of Europe controls famine--it’s non-existent now. Apart from a couple of examples of massive, state-sponsored slaughter (Nazi Germany, Communist Russia), Europe since 1700 doesn’t even begin to compare to Africa today. Casual slaughter is another thing altogether--rare in Europe, common in Africa.
AUSTIN - Jester King Craft Brewery has opened in Austin and is brewing their first commercial batch, according to a recent press release.
Divide dough in 1/2, form each 1/2 into a long log about 1/2 inch thick
where in the show this year.
Friday: It was more lab work on Friday. We started the day in the Microbiology lab plating more microorganisms. I had studied this subject matter a bit the night before so it felt a little better. My lab partner Viet and I were able to identify everything we plated which made me feel good. What didn't make me feel good was when were informed of what we should study for the test. Let's just say I have my work cut out for me.
I’m not moving anywhere, but I have had a similar fantasy about having all my favorite books on my iPad. I was reading Brian Farrey’s eye-opening novel With or Without You before bed the other night. Brian writes movingly about painting and art, and one passage made me think immediately of a passage in one of my favorite novels ever, Nabokov’s Pnin. So I got out of bed and dug up my paperback of Pnin so I could find the passage, all the while cursing that I had neither Brian’s book nor Nabokov’s on the iPad that was sitting by my bed. (I do not like getting out of bed once in.)
Of course, I take some creative license. You won’t find mention of Pamlico Sound, just Roanoke Sound, because I didn’t want to confuse readers. I’ve tried to simplify geography a little, so that readers aren’t forced to consistently refer to a map. But my hope is that as people read the book, they’ll be transported to a place that feels both awe-inspiring and familiar . . . and maybe even be inspired to visit!
“Mmmm….you really know how to make a man feel like a king” he murmured….
Let's play a little game. Let's see how "safe" your current sunscreen really is. Go ahead, I'll wait, grab your stash of sunscreen. What kind is it? What are the ingredients? What is the SPF? Did you read the warning label? Do you know what the ingredients are and what they do? Is it an aerosol spray?
Masten WY, Smith JL. Reaction time and strength in pregnant and non-pregnant employed women. J Occup Med 1988; 30: 451-456.
11. "The Safety Dance" by Men Without Hats.
while there,what ever you do don't forget to check out her upcoming baby week (february8th-14th)!will be starting soon so check it out!
Levain's walnut chocolate chip cookie is the best. And I don't even like nuts in my baked goods.
We were picking and eating and picking and eating for over an hour this afternoon after the main work was finished. I just couldn't believe the size and taste of these berries this year. They are absolutely huge and juicy and just too good to pass on.
Help him to cross through the great parching wilderness of the next
Vision Quests
I have a hard time discerning the varying degrees of light and how well the area is lit where I am shooting. This I know from experience and so now I take some test pictures before getting into the heat of the photo shoot. This tells me some amazing things about my Eye sight. The Iris opening so wide that I do not notice the slight shadows between light fixtures and my Brain filling-in details of the wall paneling. We have an awesome device in our Brain to automatically fill-in such detail! Thank God for giving us such magnificence to be used and shared!
If this is the first time for you to go to Borneo or Kalimantan and need more information you can read this http://www.lonelyplanet.com/thorntree/thread.jspa?threadID=401447
By myself I use to get lost,
I snatched her up. So fast.
Seventeen-year-old Bianca Piper is cynical and loyal, and she doesn't think she's the prettiest of her friends by a long shot. She's also way too smart to fall for the charms of man-slut and slimy school hottie Wesley Rush. In fact, Bianca hates him. And when he nicknames her "Duffy," she throws her Coke in his face.
Below is where the bonds were trading last week. Where will bonds from Germany, Spain, Italy, France and Greece be trading today?
Now that same day two of them were going to a village called Emmaus, about seven miles from Jerusalem. They were talking with each other about everything that had happened. As they talked and discussed these things with each other, Jesus himself came up and walked along with them; but they were kept from recognizing him.
The Deputy Secretary traveled to Chicago, Ill on Friday for a conference on food hubs. USDA's Agricultural Marketing Service developed the guide in partnership with the Wallace Center at Winrock International, the National Good Food Network, the National Association of Produce Market Managers and the Project for Public Spaces, as part of the National Food Hub Collaboration.
Seeing that I have no energy to actually get out of bed, I decided to flip through and go on a small shopping spree that I would share with you all. Now of course, most of these items are reproducable in much less expensive manner, but I sure do love browsing.
Violet however appears in the visible light spectrum, or rainbow, with purple simply being a mix of blue and red.
When they’re done, they spend a pleasant minute head butting me affectionately on the leg, before cuddling up together in a corner where the sun pools in the mornings.
Purple shaded ribbon, three silver material stars.
Best Zombie Romance Descriptions
Dietary Fiber 0.1 g
I, too, know all about rewriting a life. If you had asked me 15 years ago where I saw myself today I would never, in a million years, have said right here, in front of my computer, writing this blog and sharing my thoughts and my hearts desire with hundreds of people I have never laid eyes on before! I would have never said I would be doing an hour-long radio show every week about faith on an internet radio station. I would never have said I would be involved in community activism and working my hardest to help give children who are in the system in my community a voice! And then again, 15 years ago……was the time of the old Mandy!
FIELD TRIPS = BEST!!
One Tree Hill has established a strong connection with its viewers through its one-of-a-kind storyline mainly about family love, selfless romance, and deep-rooted friendship. Basically starting off with teenage dreams, high school, and basketball in the borderlines, everything just got better and better with every season. And now that it has reached its last, everyone just couldn’t believe it’s done.
Kipling’s Just So Stories: I used to be put to bed at 8:00 every night, without fail – regardless of the time of year. This annoyed me – especially in the summertime. I began reading to myself at this point by the waning light of the sun streaming into my window from the West. I remember one of the first books I enjoyed during this time was Rudyard Kipling’s Just So Stories. I was around 7 or 8.
I’ve gotten into trouble for being too “flowery” by using actual words such as innocuous and telephonic as some people didn’t think a) they were real words and b) that if they were I should actually use them. One of the biggest annoyances when it comes to language and communicating is when someone doesn’t know a word and won’t just ask what it means so we can move on with the conversation. I’ve had the bizarre experience though of people questioning me and even having the gall to make fun of me when I use a large word (there you go again using your $5 words!). It’s really all I can do to keep from laughing and it makes me feel like I’m in the twilight zone. Mind you I don’t even think I have a large vocabulary. I often feel like Marilyn in the Munsters tv show if anyone remembers that. Try to gain knowledge and use it and others see you as a freak!
this blog is just a feast for the eyes!
Set aside and allow to cool.
No-one will realise that I was right all along. No-one will remember my awful reaction to the feed in time for the next patient. No-one will remember that their so-called "safe" morphine based drug does not avoid allergy for all. No-one will finally accept that certain painkillers actually just do not work on me. The dieticians won't remember that this particular feed nearly killed me. They will still assure the next patient that "you can't be allergic to it" or "it can't get trapped it's only a liquid" No-one will make a mental note and avoid CTs and MRIs in my case next time.
when you buy one of these 5-night/5-day room and ticket packages at select Disney Resort Hotels
Trapped by no track of hours for they hanged suspended
10. Diamond
I was sitting at my desk and working last week, while Stinky and Smelly were on the floor behind me colouring pictures. Every so often I would glance back and see what sorts of pictures they were creating, but usually it wasn’t anything overly exciting. Recently, Tevye has gotten into creating abstract, modern-art sorts of pictures, some of which are very nice. While Tevye was busy putting random shapes of colour on paper, Saarah was creating this horrifying monstrosity.
A renowned London shirtmaker and part of the Louis Vuitton Moet Hennessey (LVMH) group of luxury brands, Thomas Pink draws on Britain’s rich tailoring heritage to deliver shirts crafted from the finest quality two-fold cottons that are immaculately cut and finished. Meticulous attention to detail, exclusive fabric and exquisite craftsmanship are hallmarks of this prestigious international brand.
“I´m dying soon” she mutters.
Let us not forget that Barack Obama’s White House immediately jumped out to champion these ne’er-do-wells, seeking to perhaps bail some water from his sinking Titanic. Worse yet was the gaggle of DeMarxist freaks that trailed out behind him in the statist media. From Debbie (The Mouth) Wasserman Schultz to Michael (I’m filthy rich, a corporation in my own right, but I’m one of you) Moore… who it is said can clear a whole square by himself by simply walking upwind from it.
I also played with another color combination from the stack:
I know I should've registered sooner... and I'll admit it's partly my fault. However, my real frustration is watching people's tax dollars get wasted. They've probably spent a good chunk of coin to get this system in place and they don't even use all of the functionality. What a waste?
Other notable films of the 1960s included The Great Race, What Did You Do in the War, Daddy? and The Party.
So a few weeks back I mentioned the opening of "Candy Rush" a store specializing in Candy and Ice Cream, especially long forgotten treats like those hard candy drops that come on a role paper and (even though they are new versions) the Dip Stik ! (pictured above, and called "Fun Dip") Basically Dip-Stiks were a pouch with two or three sections, each with a powdered koolaid like mix of flavor and suger. The pack also had a white oblong hard candy wand which you used to scoop out the powder and eat it.
You need to complete both the Easter themed challenge and the Blog Hop to be in with a chance of winning one of the fantastic prizes on offer. Pop over to the challenge blog to see what is on offer but it's fab! There will be one grand prize winner and two second place winners!
I realized I was super behind for Brady though since I had only done Kindergarten, and he started 3rd grade this year. Oops. Again, that motivation was lacking. When we did his handwriting for 1st grade I asked him to write as sloppy as possible and not worry about mistakes. ;)
Raina tensed as Tyler embraced her with a tenderness that contradicted his strength. He brushed the back of his hand along her cheek and swept her dark hair from her face. She felt his heartbeat while he held her against his chest, placed his hand at the back of her head, and kissed her for the first time. Raina relaxed into his arms.
Michelle: She looks like a normal person? What is she doing in this game? Beware, she'll help you move coffee tables, but she's wicked fast with a pillow.
* Wii tournament
"Really, have you?"
Quite surreal; in fact I had no idea that they were going to use the still of me on the poster and my husband almost crashed the car when he saw the billboard outside Paramount. Everyone asked me what it’s like having your face everywhere, to which my response was: “Thankfully I don’t look like that in ‘real life’”. But it was truly amazing to have a billboard outside Paramount Studios, I feel like Cinderella, finally getting a ticket to the ball:…”Ready for my close up Mr. DeMille!”.
"The Raven" is a neat, if not terribly deep, mystery film. It has an atmosphere that brought to mind a little bit Poe's stories--with their twisted intrigues, darkly romantic atmosphere, and downbeat endings where nobody wins and all is horror and misery--and a lot of the Edgar Wallace-inspired movies from the 1960s--with their masked maniacal villains undertaking impossible schemes of murder. It's a combination that I enjoyed immensely as the film unfolded. I liked the film's denouement, because until the film's last moment it looked like they were setting up a sequel... and I was relieved that they backed away from that. (Although... the way it did ultimately end, the door was left open for one, depending on what you imagine happened as the credits start to roll.)
Until Monday Feb 6th when we called them again. This time we found out they made a decision.
"Therefore I desire that this assembly shall accept the revindication of national trades unionism"
- add essential oils for an aromatherapeutic body balm
6. Cirrone-Uplands Park Road (Escape)
The organizers chose an unusually random selection of Belgian beers. Lefty sampled some, and I joined him for a few. Tongerlo Prior Tripel (9%) had a fruity aroma but an overly honeyish mid palate and final. Oud Beersel Bersalis Kadet was bland and mild. Charles Quint Blonde Dorée/Keizer Karel Goudblond was pleasant enough, but without much flavor to mask its 8.5% alc. Even the regular De Koninck (bottle) seemed dull. However, we finished the afternoon with a strong, heavy Malheur 12, which was, thankfully, the best beer at the event.
This is my banner for my stand, I am so pleased with it, really I need to zigzag around all the letters but at the moment, I will leave it as it is. I might mess it up if I try to do it quickly so I’ll sort that out after the event. I have a some more spinning/knitting events lined up and will hopefully have it completely finished by the time they come round.
Yes, the water buffalo is not afraid to show its displeasure, its disdain, or its bum. But, this personality plus is a big part of its charm. You never have to guess what a water buffalo is feeling.
It’s also worth noting that human evolution has not magically stagnated. In their book, The 10,000 Year Explosion, University of Utah anthropologists Gregory Cochran and Henry Harpending argue that human evolution “is now happening about 100 times faster than its long-term average over the six million years of our existence.” I’m not suggesting that we purposefully destroy our environment, but isn’t it possible that future generations of humans (or even trans-humans) will evolve and adapt to an earth with a changed climate? If we claim to know what kind of environment future generations want, I think we are guilty of a particularly egregious form of epistemic hubris. Let’s let them build their own clocks.
There becomes a point where I looked at the past. The guys. The list, all with a little sub title names and a story to go with. There a few, significant in every girls list thye will have the few which were pronounced as the ‘bad guys’. The ones who are just no good. The ‘players’ the ones who are like drugs, you can’t get enough of em.
He hosted counter top Kettles in 101 stores during the Christmas campaigns and supported the Senior Transportation program with funding of new vans. In 1984, he was a supporter of The Capital Campaign to built the Citadel, located at 2808 SE 44th.
This is NOT the hallmark of a news source or an outlet which calls itself an ‘Independent Media Centre…for the creation of radical, accurate, and passionate tellings of the truth’ and then goes on to criticise ‘corporate media’s distortions and unwillingness to cover the efforts to free humanity’.
And the friendly chatter of tourists.
The Dark Knight Rises online website told people to go out and look for clues at certain addresses, in a way to hunt down the Batman. In return, it seems like the public has been rewarded with the all new trailer that’ll debut in theaters on May 4th in front of The Avengers.
1 Kawanga! Los Straitjackets 2 Sandoway Exotics 3 Gasser Exotics 4 Valley of the Kaisers Kaisers 5 Mondo Bondo Four Piece Suit 6 A Shot in the Dark Four Piece Suit
INN: In your town hall presentation you seemed have some concern about companies. Why is that?
But it is quite fitting of my writing life these past 3 weeks. This is the first period in my writing-life where I am actually putting off the writing of something and making excuses for myself in doing so. The truth of the matter is that the project I’ve mentioned a few times…the non-horror and rather personal novel…is making me nervous.
Mountain Bike Oregon brings a lot of people to town. They like bikes. They like trails. They like beer. On Thursday, as they head to Greenwaters Park to set up camp and get oriented, they find themselves becoming hungry and thirsty. Fortunately, there is a nearby pub that offers solutions to both. And even more fortunately, as we are sponsors of the event, each rider, guide and industry personnel gets a ticket for a free pint of our ale. There IS such a thing as free beer. It's obviously the first introduction to some to the goodness that is real ale, so a brief explanation is often required. I had one person come back up to the bar and yell "this beer is warm", to which I replied "free, too". He did manage to get through it anyway. That's the good news. The bad news that's also good news is that we're running out of beer again. The pumps certainly have been busy. A cask of Union Dew (as dispensed at the 2010 GBBF) was dispatched in two hours on Thursday, and the hoppy amber died shortly afterward. I now have to get back to brewing, as the brewery is full of empty casks that need washing and eventual filling.
Macy, who currently stars in the U.S. version of U.K. television hit Shameless, has two children by Huffman – Sophia, 11 and nine-year-old Georgia.
He then blessed the crab and the cross appeared on the crab shell.
TIP: So, you realize you added too much liquid and the gravy is too thin. Don't panic. Just don't fall apart and add flour straight into the thin gravy, or the lumps will come. I am speaking from experience, here. It's not pretty. Instead, you can mix about 1 Tablespoon of corn starch and whisk a little water into it, till it's lump free. Now, very slooooooooooowly, add the cornstarch and whisk while the gravy bubbles. Cornstarch works very fast, so go easy. If it's still not thick enough, then add some more. Oh. If you have Wondra instant flour, then you can carefully add that to gravy to thicken, but whisk like crazy. In the end, if there are still lumps, just strain the gravy through a fine mesh sieve.
Life has changed since coming out, i wake up every day knowing I’m me, the human being jesus blessed me to be. And nobody can change that. I inspire each and every one of you young boy’s out their, if questioning becomes a part of your life, or your afraid to come out, take a breathe, step back, realize that coming out is not a bad thing, it make’s you a better person, emotionally and physically, knowing pretty soon your gonna wake up to a man you love, and be openly happy about it.
Image by Mezza – The Dawning Sun at Urunga NSW 2012
If you haven't been to the iCopic store yet, you should!! Get there NOW....there prices seriously are great and they sell Copic Markers, Refills, STAMPS, paper....and more. So you must go check them out!
The tale turns on the opening of an ancient burial mound in the tiny village of Devil’s End. The event, which will take place at the stroke of midnight on April 30th (Beltane), is to be broadcast on BBC Three (which, in reality, didn’t come into existence until many, many years later), making the whole thing reminiscent to someone of my age of Geraldo Rivera’s opening of Al Capone’s vaults…only in this instance, something is found, or more precisely, unleashed. The Doctor and Jo (Katy Manning) head to Devil’s End to investigate, only to discover the Master (Roger Delgado) is behind the sinister goings-on. He’s summoning forces that have existed since the dawn of man – an alien called Azal, who belongs to a race known as the Daemons, and he’s very displeased with mankind’s lack of progress.
When risen, knock it back and add the fruits and peel, knead again and leave to rise a second time. This is not for people in a hurry!
Nonsense! No-one even listened to them. If you weren't making an impassioned speech that mentioned Bevan at least three times or spitting the word "Blairism" across the chamber, you might as well have gone home.
“Males of guna tamas are ready to pursue this aim at any cost, including knowingly false promises or rapes — and up to murder due to a sexual intercourse with, at least, a corpse. Of course, such males do not take care of either treating nicely the woman, or to inflicting unnecessary pain during defloration, or giving to the woman an orgasm, or that she will not have an unwanted pregnancy. After all, these males care only about themselves!
These came from Dennis, too. It's kind of a cheap way to pick up Kershaw cards. But I'm not the one who put four unrelated players on one card. Believe me, if I produced cards, I'd never do this.
This beautiful poem and gratitude ring are by a dear friend who enjoys getting creative when inspired. The rings were made with love by her and her two little girls to serve as a daily reminder to be grateful for the little and big things in life.
I was the only parent at Family Fun Night for the 6th graders who didn't stand on the side lines but rather played. It was so worth the tiredness, leaky bladder (thank you four pregnancies), loss of breath, sweat, and yes even the black eye. It was a blast and my son (and his best friend who was with us) said they weren't at all embarrassed because of how well I played *heart swell*
Saucony running shoes have been recommended mostly by professional runners and athletes. This is because of the unique features and durability of the shoes. They are guaranteed to last for a very long period of time so your money won’t go into waste. Fitting is one of the most notable features of Saucony shoes. They have the perfect fitting for your feet. They also comes with perfect cushioning to make sure that your feet are comfortable for running and also to prevent your feet from getting injured. The right fitting and cushioning of the shoes are very important because the comfort of your feet depend on these factors. If you are not comfortable with your shoes, you cannot last long with your run and outdoor activities and you may end up wasting your time with injured feet.
Caution: This might be all theory
13. If I were elvis, would you kiss me?
least until modern times, such as why we have vampires in contemporary books, movies and television shows. According to the predominant mythology, every vampire was once a human, who, after being bitten by a vampire, died and rose from the grave as a monster. Vampires crave the blood of the living, whom they hunt during the night. They use their protruding fangs to puncture their victims' necks. At least the European ones anyway.
Cory Monteith
Ooh, but not right now, not right now,
My doppelgänger cures the cold,
There is no possibility
Me (having arrived by this time): "Wow, that is a shark! That's pretty cool!
This is a great principle to lay hold of. It does give us some responsibilities, however. Knowing that we are useful to God throughout our entire lives, we must harden our faith now. We must be prepared so that when we reach our elder years, we will continue on spiritually stronger than when we started.
But he’s there for a Shoot Out
It is very snowy in London and even I have had to wear ugly shoes so I could try not to fall over again. Unfortunately two minutes away from the office I slip over and whack my head on the pavements.
11. Blogging has given me the kind of record of my family, my writing and my life that I would never have achieved without it. I'm not a journal keeper. I'm not a diarist. I am, however, a blogger. And I am so very grateful for those snippets of my day-to-day life. It's amazing what you forget. (Vale Alla Hoo Hoo.)
commemorate over 100 Heads of State and 25,000 participants gathering in Rio de Janeiro, Brazil for the Rio+20 United Nations Conference on Sustainable Development from 20th – 22nd of June 2012.
As beautiful and varied as Mynydd Hiraethog’s landscape is, the rolling moorland felt isolated and lonely. I think this panorama conveys some sense of the area. Click the image for a larger view.
I'm not going to apologize for my honesty, you live in denial, you live with pathetic yourself for another fucking day.
“Excuse me. Is this the only playground around here?”
Not being a young adult, but yes travelling with my parents - we brisked past the pubs towards the mall and supermarket at the end of the riverfront walk to stock up on drinks (another reason that makes Clarke Quay a convenient place to stay).
And I was called violent by a man who witnessed me ripping apart boxes so I could fit them in the giant dumpsters.
Recently, my daughter and I had what we call a "Mommy Day." What does a Mommy Day consist of, you ask? It is simply a special day that I put aside once or twice a month to spend with my 7 year old daughter, Nevaeh....just the two of us. She makes a list of five places she would like to go. It is totally up to her. On this particular day...these were her 5 choices:
And glowing red rose art
These Jews had it in their minds that they could set the rules for the rest of the world. They were given God’s name and they were given the position of superiority. It was based on the absolute sovereignty of God and what God has established, He certainly will not cast down.
God gave us the gift of companionship to encourage us. God gives us perfect days to satisfy us, to strengthen us and make glad our hearts. Enjoy life’s miracles.
Make sure you give plenty of hugs: proper touching improves a child's development. Touch their head, shoulder, hand, etc.and smile when you do. Silence sometimes speaks louder than words.
Outside the museum are 13 murals, painted on the sides of neighborhood buildings. Most pay homage to the violent history and Bogside’s heroes; one envisions a bright future.
12 DESTRUCTION (Loverboy) 4'11
25) THE CREEP – Milton DeLugg
C. One Group That Believes In A Partial Rapture Is The “Baptist Bride”
One of the characteristics of the new social contract ushered in by both George W. Bush and Barack Obama is the increasing power of creditors to govern outright, from tax farming by banks to the use of credit checks to access employment opportunities.
Whew! The last few days have really been scorchers for us! We had such a great response from our first Weekend GetAways post (Galveston Island), that I thought we’d do another…this time let’s look at a beautiful part of the state full of rivers, shade trees and history…New Braunfels!
I remember being a single girl and feeling like my life was over during break ups. I just knew that breaking up with someone was one of the hardest things I'd ever go through. Boy was I wrong! Are break ups painful? Yes. But breaking up or getting divorced rather than working to make it work is taking the easy way out. Staying is the hard part.
Imagine, everything on the camera, prior to snapping the pic, must be manually adjusted.
My mom never said a negative word to me about my appearance. She always told me I was beautiful, even as she permed my 7-year-old hair and took me on countless shopping trips for better clothes. Hmmmm.
It’s moments like these that I’m glad to have been a part of! I will definitely be signing up for another Special Olympics New Jersey fundraising event in the near future and hopefully will get to share my experiences with everyone then, as well!
will I do this project again?
Meanwhile-- Grab a freebie! Click on the posters to get a freebie of Jabber the Reteller.
Last week I suddenly realised my mother’s birthday was coming up. I knew she very much enjoyed reading PD James books, so I decided to pop down to my local Collins bookstore and buy a couple. I walked into the store and after searching for a while found only one PD James novel, her most recent
Swinging between inaction and action. And yet I don’t know whether action is action or the inaction is the real action.
“Silence is the abuser’s greatest weapon.”
With Tarragon Vinaigrette
That was the bad news. The good news is that the physicians treating me believe the disease was caught at a fairly early stage. I have quickly become aware that with prostate cancer there are more numbers thrown at patients than a baseball official scorer has to deal with during a doubleheader. There is the PSA, mine ran in the 10-11 range depending on the test. Not great, but still in a range that indicates a disease that is treatable. There is the Gleason score, mine is a 6. They tell me that is fairly good news. Out of 12 samples taken during a biopsy, just one showed cancer and another had a pre-cancerous lesion. Again, this was encouraging to my doctors. I had a bunch of other tests, including a bone scan, scan of my pelvic region and organs, and a lung x-ray. All came back clean.
Gypsy with Ethel Merman.
JERI
Is only hindered by preconception
Today’s Wednesday WOW! is butterfly.
It was Anna Sewell in her wonderful novel Black Beauty who wrote:
Green grass and trees
Much like the commercial for insurance, she apparently feels that’s not a safe place, so she gets it and carries it under the bed. Um, there are dust bunnies under our bed bigger than she is…needless to say it isn’t left there either. Apparently the only safe location is in the chair. With her. And me.
Not forever in green pastures
So the committee, which has only an advisory vote, agreed to support the request for a variance from the Board of Standards and Appeals, subject to several conditions: 12 parking spaces in the basement; no commercial entrance along Dean Street, with glass extending only some 40 feet from Flatbush; a six-story maximum height along Flatbush; and a two-story extension along Dean Street above the garage space.
Shape memory polymers (SMPs) can be deformed and fixed into a temporary shape and then recover their original permanent shape under external stimuli such as heat, explains lead researcher Hesheng Xia from Sichuan University, Chengdu. 'When a piece of polymer is placed in the body, it is subjected to heating at 37°C everywhere and the whole piece undergoes shape recovery,' he says. Xia and co-workers directed an ultrasound beam on a selected area of a polymer, causing a local rise in temperature and triggering shape recovery only in that area. Xia adds that ultrasound has the advantage of easily penetrating body tissue.
The service was great. They had found a really good priest, funny and light, not serious and boring. He had a load of good things to say, and the way he said it meant that you didn't feel you were being reprimanded or you're about to fall asleep. The bride looked absolutely gorgeus! So happy and radiant. And a really stunning dress. The groom looked equally happy and radiant. A match made in heaven!
We had a brush with the law recently and thankfully lived to tell the tale. We still wake sweating in the night to the sound of “He can have them all” and visions of backing the Hiace up to the door of Studio 8. Thanks to @irishmammies for the shout out and to @shirtntie for hearing it and tipping us off..
Cuisine: BBQ Pulled Pork Sandwiches
Mr. Universe and bodybuilder
So I was like okay, what do I do now? I’m not a tech-savvy individual, so I just let Norton go about its business and did some research until I decided I could not handle the nonsense anymore. Like I said earlier, other people were having this problem as well! I went and complained about this to my dad, also mentioning that I am not alone in my casual gaming-related tribulations. He said that EA would probably fix the problem if lots of people were in the same situation, so I waited, hoping and praying that More Like Electronic Farts would finally admit that they made a mistake and release a formal apology, as well as a patch that would fix 1.32′s problems.
New Belgium Ranger IPA Growler Special Offer (4/17)
Warby Parker offers boutique-quality glasses for a fraction of the price of what your local chain charges for lenses (with a coupon!). The company was founded by B-school friends who decided to change the status quo and cut out the middle-man to drive down costs on great glasses (AND for a great cause).
Although I have several stitched pieces, the first chart was a class design in 2009 called "Twisted Threads" (the one shown here). It was a class design and was the first one fully charted, tested, and taught from my little book of ideas and scribbles. The little book is getting very full, and it was encouragement from my friends and family that convinced me to give designing a try.
And I don’t know about you, but I think Jesus’ prediction of this real-life event is a bit more scary; definitely one I’ll focus on avoiding. I guess we can all thank our lucky stars that we have some advice on how to avoid the events of Saw 3D: having nothing to do with it.
Day One: Cars on red-carpet “concors d’elegance” display at Fisherman’s Wharf, San Francisco; harbor cruise dinner
Aside from her many erotics novels, countless media gigs on TV and radio and in print (and Madame Arcati), Molly re-designed GB (or should that be UK?) with fashion queen stints on Nova, the Sunday Times, Harpers, and more. It is to her eternal credit that she left all these publications of her own volition, usually to a chorus of imaginative profanity that was all hers. Most publications are a filthy pit of egotism and inexperience. A pure soul such as Moll's could only endure so much before the bigger picture beckoned.
His first solo album 'Henry: The Iron Man' was released thru Beta Lactam Ring Records, second one 'Silk-screened' is published on Trace Recordings and upcoming is 'A Scent Of Garmambrosia' CD on Aagoo + a picture-disc single with Cosey Fanni Tutti on Dirter Promotions. In the works are collabs with Murcof, Simon Fisher Turner, ASVA, Vultures and "Cordophony" gathering music whose sound comes from the vibrations of one or several strings.
Drafts shouldn’t be graded until at least three or four years into the future but that doesn’t mean we can’t grade value. An A+ draft grade does not mean Team X are going to win a super bowl because of how many awesome players they have drafted, it means they’ve assembled a group of rookies with the most potential and value at that particular point in the draft.
Free him from his ice-borne hell . . .Stolen from his beloved home in the Highlands of Scotland, imprisoned in the Unseelie king’s dark, frosty kingdom, Aedan MacKinnon endured centuries of torture before becoming the icy, emotionless Vengeance, the dark king’s dispatcher of death and destruction in the mortal realm.
Punctuated by the sound of tears on an LCD screen
The path where the dump files are to be stored. If you do not use the default path, then make sure that the folder contains ACLs that allow the crashing process to write data to the folder.
The cops were apparently not prepared to make mass arrests and were slow to respond to the chaos, though it quickly broke up. The blog, Mission Local, has a good round up of the scene from last night.
She could feel Christian’s arms tighten around her, Addison feeling more secure in his arms than any other place in the world. She had missed him so much, being away from him like an open sore that wouldn’t heal.
So here is my card:
Place is unavoidable unless you write purely dialogue and the more I write the more I’m drawn to that mode of expression. My radio play, Vladimir and Estragon are Dead, for example, takes place in limbo – there are only the two characters, no props, no scenery – and in my novel, Left, a large section of the book takes place in cyberspace and is presented as a simple chat log. I’m not the first writer to do that kind of thing, in fact entire novels have been written as pure dialogue: Delores Claiborne, by Stephen King is one that might surprise most people – the story opens with a quote that does not close until the very last page of the book – but there have been other novels written in dialogue before: Nicholson Baker's Vox springs to mind, although it's not completely in dialogue, and there's also Corey Mesler's Talk. I've personally written two short stories completely in dialogue, 'Just Thinking', which was published in The Ranfurly Review and 'Ugly Truths' which appeared in Ink, Sweat and Tears. It's quite refreshing actually to be able to forget about those boring descriptive passages.
Now I’m standing on the rooftop, ready to fall
I don't know anything about that specific school. I'm sure it's a fine school, but when the art classes are producing cookie cutter art, it's likely because the curriculum has been tainted with the curse of usefulness, applicability, and practicality. These things should not be the starting point for education, but viewed rather as its inevitable bi-products, just as the hard logic of algebra remains with me long after I've forgotten how to solve for x.
The movie features an almost uniformly Van Morrison soundtrack. For reasons that escape me, they use as many covers as originals. Still, I love the idea of uniform soundtracks. But because I can’t praise anything wholeheartedly, I will say that Van Morrison doesn’t exactly match the movie. The couple’s song–”their song”–works very very well, but the others less so. At least they didn’t use Moondance (overused).
This Roti John is an all time favorite that is served in an 8-inch long bun combined with the John filling of a whipped egg and either minced chicken or beef. Topped up with chilli, mayo, onion, coleslaw and a dash of black pepper sauce.
So I guess the secret of happiness is inside each of you…I hope you find it!
ZZ Top- Tush (Fandango LP- 1975)
Le Couvent de la Tourette
Not only did I start watching all of the films within the 1001 Movies You Must See Before You Die book, but I also decided to keep a diary of sorts, with detailed thoughts and analysis for each of the entries that I watched. It was never meant to be an attention getter, it was merely a way for me to collect my thoughts into a space and look back over it whenever I got the urge. However, I did get a little bit of attention – attention that I have always appreciated and accepted graciously. Last summer, one of the marketing directors over at Barron’s Publishing (the publishing company for the 1001 book) contacted me and complimented me on my success. He followed up the compliments with the mailing of the most recent edition of the text, a review copy for me to look over. In addition to that, I’ve also been lucky enough to get many comments on my writings and one of the fondest comments I remember was from Karen Burroughs Hannsberry. At the time, I had no idea who she was, but after publishing her comment and checking out her Shadows and Satin blog, I realized two things: (1) She had an immense passion for films, most notably film noir and pre-code films, and (2) She wrote about them with a lovely style. I also quickly realized that she wasn’t just another blogger and that she had actually written a few books of her own, something that only made me appreciate her comment to my lowly blog more.
The stories in this collection cover some familiar sci-fi tropes (time travel, other planets, apocalyptic futures) but with a focus on character and humanity that is missing in some science fiction. My favorite story might be "All My Darling Daughters," set in an extraterrestrial boarding school for the daughters of wealthy men who donate sperm to unknown surrogates in order to create heirs who they don't meet until they've grown up. Our narrator is a bad little rich girl (with a really great Clockwork Orange kind of vocabulary) who is used to getting high and having sex with all the boys, but who finds her sex life thwarted when the boys come back from vacation with freaky little ferret things with obscenely prominent vaginas. I'm not sure what you envision happening next, but I can pretty much guarantee that it isn't what you expect.
Pick #5: Lee Sangeun (이상은)
I’ve heard it referred to as a “crisis of faith.”
Mckenzee: Daddy, you know you don’t always win.
They aren't gem quality - but they are pearls. Some mussels had more than others. We had to be very careful when eating them. It was similar to eating pheasant or duck . . . you have to watch for the bird shot.
Case in point 1: trainee A doesn't get the hoppy blonde british ale (we'll call it 'plantagenet') at all - too bitter. But give her a 10% double IPA from bleeding Norway, (we'll call that 'oris') and she's after another one. Now there's a ton of exotic hops in both beers but oris has loads more than plantagenet, but it is also DAMN STRONG and the only way you can get extra strength in beer is by mashing up loads of extra malt. oris is also, a much more balanced beer, now I'm not sure whether it is easier to achieve a better balance simply by putting in more of everything and thus gaining a stronger, bolder and subsequently less nuanced flavour but that perhaps is too much fiddle-de-de. What I'm saying is that my friend that has a very limited knowledge of beer is more charmed by the mad strong beer than the lighter very hoppy beer and the reasons for this are malt and balance.
Today I want to pick up on a theme in my most recent post: ‘Moving on means forgetting.’ Wiser folk than I have differing opinions on this, but that’s the classical view. To ‘move on’ is to emerge at a place in life where you either don’t think about the person you’ve lost, or have total control over the moments when you do. (A laudable aim, in my opinion.)
Wynkoop Brewing Company Anniversary Ale
Purple hair was just an awesome bonus and being nimble, sexy, and assertive are three things out of a million that put psylocke firmly into the #2 spot...
misdeeds which were covered up and so far
Alan Mowbray Topper
The video will contain recorded video, images, and messages from you guys who are interested to their music. The basic things that I need are given below.
My husband's fav is French toast with honey. He's a beekeeper's grandson so he always choses honey over syrup.
Relatively, food portions / servings in America are also huge. That's why eating in a restaurant is always an experience to me..everytime. I never stopped being amazed at the portions the customer gets! It’s humongous! I’m telling you, one serving they give you here can already feed two Filipinos, at least. I am not kidding.
Tonight, I saw it again, and I had time to stop, so I did. It’s a nondescript truck (a little signage or artwork would go a long way, in my opinion!):
When I said it is all spiritual the Bible says the we don’t battle with each other but against Powers and principalities. So back to my original question who are you going to trust?
I know that I could be more specific, and I will be in the future, but for now here’s a finished sewing project, a sock bunny duo, that I started twenty years ago and finished in 2012. All of the sewing was completed years ago, I only had to assembled the clothes on the sock bunny, and hand-sew the features of the face.
Maybe he should have just called them faggots and gotten it over with.
By this they likely mean: "Will my child end up a weirdo? Will they have friends? Will children be unprepared for the real world if they don’t go to school?"
Top lettuce and additional veggies with steak and fries.
If I were to feel these impulses, but then dither, and not carry them through, or restrain my actions for fear that I have gone too far or that it isn’t worth the effort, if my “two minds” are in disharmony, then I suppose I would be unstable, and certainly less happy. There’s something to be said for going ahead with a plan even when you’re not sure it will work. There’s something to be said for ignoring the threat of failure and carrying on. There’s something to be said for being ambivalent about your course of action, and doing it anyway. In fact, your ambivalence may even be a sign of wisdom and may be critical to your eventual success.
Article 145
As I was walking round, I met up with a group that was walking up from the other side of Dudley, so I joined them and walked up. They was all in the road and on the path.
I also made her climb eucalyptus trees for the Rustling Leaves Beret photoshoot.
They’d called it a day just before Christmas 1996, causing an outpouring of grief from their loyal army of fans the like of which hadn’t been seen in decades, leaving the boys from the band with the biggest decision of their lives – just what did they do now the pop star dream was over? Because it didn’t
The first thing you’ve got to realize, they are talking about quantum states, which are what makes you YOU, people have been saying in the comments of the video how even if that were true the other you wouldn’t be the same because you’d have both had different experiences and such. They are saying that as far as the universe is concerned, you are made of quantum states, and it is statistically probable that you would run into yourself (the same quantum state).
Quixotic Paperie was started on June 1st 2009 by Elaine Hughes. Having been an avid crafter (and craft shopper!) for a number of years, Elaine wanted to share her passion and see where it might take her - so, Quixotic Paperie was born! Since then, the store has grown, and now stocks a fabulous range of rubber stamps from around the world: The Greeting Farm, Kraftin' Kimmie Stamps, SCACD Stamps, Paper Makeup Stamps, Belles 'n Whistles, the Mo Manning for Stamping Bella range, Stempelglede and more!
as I’m coming home with you
What is the function of the brachial gland exudate?
When we sat, the woman congratulated us heartily on our impending marriage and answered our questions easily and with apparent enthusiasm. She asked about the wedding and how it was going to be while simultaneously processing our paperwork.
To Enter The Grand Prize Giveaway, you must do the following:
‘Christina Hendricks is absolutely fabulous. We need more of these role models,’ she added.
“You don’t hold back,” Shadow Stalker commented, seemingly unfazed by her circumstances. She tested the strength of her bonds, experimentally.
months have gone by without
The truth isn't an easy thing to handle. It's hard to find the balance between not giving someone enough truth and pushing far too much truth onto someone. One extreme puts me in the position of being an ingenuine liar and the other turns me into an obnoxious inconsiderate tattle-tale/nag.
I, too, really really really hate, with a white-hot passion that burns like a thousand suns, women who are misogynists because they are desperate for validation from men. The prototypical, “I’m not like those other, killjoy women, YOU GUUUUUUUUYSS!!! Pay attention to me!!!” women. They are ass. Yes. Ass.
A bit later I was pondering what to feed these hungry kids..
It is hard at first but as the month goes on they realize they never needed 95% of the clutter and items they had in the house. They actually spend more time together as a family. They go for walks and play games.
When police in 2003 busted a Texas man accused of dealing cocaine, a judge set his bond at $100,000. An attorney posted the bond, but the man jumped bail and years after the drug bust is nowhere to be found, reports the Ft. Worth Star-Telegram. The attorney didn’t pay the $100,000. He hasn’t yet paid a penny. The bond forfeiture went into a kind of legal thicket, eliminating a big incentive for bond agents to track the suspect down.
Rock Art Magnumus Ete Tomahawkus ESB3
Once you have rinsed out the wash, then apply this rinse to the ends of your hair. It is not needed to apply to the roots and might make your hair too oily and sticky if you do. Just concentrate on the ends. Again allow it to sit for a few minutes while you finish up and then rinse with cool/cold water for best detangling effect.
7. There is a new cable TV channel. It is called DogTV. It runs 24-hour programming for dogs. According to The New York Times the programming consists of "three- to six-minute segments featuring grassy fields, bouncing balls and humans rubbing dog tummies." Sounds better than the crap I've been watching.
The IPKat is disappointed that there has been so little debate so far on the content of Richard's two earlier posts and hopes this is only because readers were awaiting his final words before deciding what to say.
“When you visit someone,” offers one young thing.
Sorry my dear son… I will surely wait to find that little tea cup Yorkie for us both and find avenues to get over my little fear of dogs RATHER than obtain a cat! UGGHHH…..
But when the lead breaks
But this doesn’t mean other people look at her and think “oh god, she’s broken… what will happen when *this* happens – or what not, etc. etc. etc”
“If we’re going to carry on this relationship, he has to get saved, and we’re going to have to get married” she thought to herself.
Note: Floatopia was a short-running, daytime event in Isla Vista on par with Halloween. Isla Vista is a small town with an overwhelming majority of student residents; it sits on scenic coastal bluffs just north of UCSB’s campus.
Change is certainly needed; in particular, the state effectively grants monopolies to a few lucky private, for-profit beer and wine wholesalers. These regulatory privileges should be struck from state law in the name of fairness and competition.
Bob and Cat had already gotten the canteen set up so I joined them. As I walked by the burning house (I was across the street) the smoke hurled my direction in a gust of wind and it choked me and made my eyes water. Nasty, dangerous stuff that smoke is. I walked quickly and got free of it but not before the smell of it permeated my clothes and hair.
I was thinking back to my pregnancy with Laken and have realized a few things are different this time around.
When Jo is offered the opportunity to get all the remaining money she needs in one job, she’s not as eager to accept as one might expect. That’s because her client wants her to spy and take photos of singer-songwriter Ned Hartnett – the celebrity who showed her kindness a few years ago and has held a special place in Jo’s heart ever since.
Treasure Island at 413 East 6th street
But just as he is about to turn in his uniform for the last time the order comes to scramble. A strange UFO has been sighted on a direct course for Tokyo. The government suspects this may be a missile launched from an unfriendly military power in the area. Maki’s orders are to identify the object or destroy it.
Bingo! We had a winner.
Mary Black ... Betty
GEJ is not clueless, GEJ is weak. Yes he is. Weak in the sense that he lacks the might to take drastic decisions (albeit, I still wonder where he got that mind to remove fuel subsidy on January 1). For example, what is stopping him from kicking out Allison Maduke after Lawan’s breeze has blown and we’ve seen the anus of the fowl? His weaknesses have been demonstrated in many of his speeches. I do see it in his eyes. Arguably, his weakness is what this deadly Boko Haram has taken full advantage of.
He agreed, but then got confused and said “Well, I don’t think EVERY DAY! Ha ha ha!!! None of my friends talk to their parents DAILY. I think maybe GIRLS do that!”
Oh Gosh
I don't have a cell phone for myself. When I am away from home I borrow either Jordan's or Devin's phone or, if Jeff is home I will take his. Devin and Jordan each purchased their own phones and pay their portion of the cell phone bill. Jeff and Devin are both self-employed and their phones and usage are tax deductible.
So yesterday, Kerri played hookie from school to help continue celebrating Nana's birthday. In reality, she was up all night with horrific night terrors, but we told her the reason she slept in was to play hookie. Kerri thought this was a great idea, and said she would tell her Catholic school teacher that she was playing "hooker" with us. I am sure that is going to go over very well!
This 77 page book is filled with ideas on all things idea-ology, plus just about every technique I could think to put in it. The book is hard cover and metal spiral bound so it sits open flat on your table while you’re creating. I share my favorite supplies, tips, techniques, and a gallery showing ideas of putting it all together…
The ISM website states that it is a “Palestinian-led movement committed to resisting the Israeli apartheid in Palestine by using nonviolent, direct-action methods and principles. Founded by a small group of primarily Palestinian and Israeli activists in August, 2001, ISM aims to support and strengthen the Palestinian popular resistance by providing the Palestinian people with two resources, international solidarity and an international voice with which to nonviolently resist an overwhelming military occupation force.”
Illiza, who claimed she has the support of the public, said the police would continue to hunt for punks in Banda Aceh.
her favor.”
Not to do what I have done
Bill Swift was acquired via free agency from San Francisco following the 1994-95 strike. Swift was the first major pitching acquisition from free agency and was somewhat of a minor success, mainly because of injuries. In his three seasons in Colorado, Swift had a record of 14-10 with a 5.47 ERA and 102 strikeouts. Late in the 1997 season, Swift was released and signed (for 4 days) by Baltimore.
He said “I’ve had some tough trips in me day but never one like that.”
Adventurers from France speak French, a Romance language related to Spanish and Latin.
I proceeded to tell him that I wasn't setting up a joke, I was asking a legitimate (to me) question. Then I whacked him in the back of the head for the "WTF look" and told him what happened.
How do you escape
Last week I had 7 images in the Postcard Art Friends Of The Arts Fundraiser for ISU. Over 100 artists participated – 257 post card size original art pieces were submitted. One 4 x 6 oil auctioned for $2200!! A piece of mine, the street scen below, was bid on by a professor who thoughtfully emailed me to let me know my image had found a home. How cool is that.
I meant I watched lost...not ran a marathon.
I ate a good meal late last night. I didn’t worry about what I was eating except to make sure that it was healthy and a good protein/combo protein and finally slept. I woke up feeling like a new woman. Finally this episode has abated. Thank you for your good thoughts and prayers. God rocks, She heard you.
Whiting’s romance with Wrangler turned heads in the 1970s: He was an openly gay porn actor 22 years her junior. But he told the Chicago Tribune they “see things the same way, comically, professionally and romantically.” He turned his attention to theater and cabaret, crafting Whiting’s cabaret acts and several shows. Their marriage lasted until his death in 2009.
God requires these conditions of His people:
Questions without obstacles
VARENIKI – 14.00
While there is no shortage of Asian actresses on TV, there isn’t much steady work for them to be the sustainable marketable force behind films. Many actresses who have had starring roles in film, either find themselves doing more TV work or going back to the international markets that made them famous in the first place.
I also liked how Foster created the side story of Barber, the musician, and Jasmine. They weren’t really side characters as half the book was probably about them as well. I loved the sexual tension and the fierceness of Jasmine. They were fun to read about.
Back to the clinic - I'm not educated enough to interpret it in detail for you, but here are some key points that Doug and I took away:
It’s not known whether the figure he quoted was an exact number or a rough estimate.
With the prism of years and the revisions of memory, there are a thousand lessons I can glean from my friendship with Carol. Rationalizations, perhaps. They might even all be true. Even and especially the lies.
read countless (189 to be exact) blog posts on my google reader,
Of all the broad religious traditions, I think Buddhism comes closest to retaining the spirit of its founder and greatest teacher, Gautama the Buddha. Buddhists have never started a war to advance their cause. No one has ever been forced to convert to Buddhism.
Warm your oven. While it is warming, take the mixer bowl off the mixer, dust the top of the dough with all-purpose flour and seal tightly with plastic wrap. Turn off the oven and place the bowl in it. Let the dough rise until it is about doubled, about half an hour.
Tending bar at the safari guesthouse, I listen to an Australian woman complain about her love life. She tells me that the only heterosexual single men left in Sydney are either deadbeats or perverts. After clicking my tongue in commiseration, I offer the following advice:
In 2001 Pierre Mario, former head of French intelligence acknowledged that Bongo used money stolen from his poverty stricken country to pay subsidies to French political parties and politicians. He noted that “the subsidies of Bongo serve everyone at the time of French elections and create a sort of backward colonialism”. The irony of the situation is that while Omar Bongo saw nothing wrong with how he mismanaged Gabon oil revenue to enrich himself and his cronies, France also saw nothing wrong on how a president of its former colony squandered money on properties and on politicians in France.
Of schoolmasters
And all the reasons she should not.
Two Veggie burgers with olive oil
It is not CAIR, it is not ISNA.
Before you invest in this company, you should look under the hood and find out more about their products and sales revenue.
Lob City Vs. The Team no one wants to see in the playoffs. Last year the Grizzles from the 8th position and with the tougher of the two Gasol brothers made a heck of a run in the playoffs. All without their best perimeter player in Rudy Gay. Well they are loaded this year and poised to be a major disruption in the offices of the TV network execs, because they may be the only team besides the Spurs that America just doesn’t like falling in love with on TV. Nonetheless, they’ve earned this seeding for a reason. The Clippers will come in with their high wire act and Griffin will surely get some highlights, but as I have said a lot this year, his “poster” game will not be enough. His post game will have to step up for them to win this series. I don’t think he has enough to offset what the lefty Zach “Zebo” Randolph is going to do to him on the post. It will be entertaining, but won’t be enough for this Clippers team this year. Losing the veteran leader Chauncey Billups will ultimately be the difference.
I work up some courage, and head on over to the closest living room window to the bird but that also has the easiest framework to open. The bird has flown over against the farthest window and is presently hidden from view. My fingers are not working fast enough. For if that bird flies up at me in terror, I will be out of here faster than a flutter of an eyelash.
Alane Starko, “A Special Kind of Mother”, Ensign, Aug. 1995, 52
I'll share mine as soon as I can. It's just a little too close right now.
I am a life long textile addict. I have been sewing clothing and items for my home since I can remember. But quilting? I tried it once in the seventies and walked away. It was much too tedious and labor intensive for me.
Memory even if “you” looked, you would no longer see “me”.
I got very excited.
Rebirth’s total running time is about 90 minutes—half the length of its source material. But Miller doesn’t simply chop Birth of a Nation up. Most scenes are intact, or at least accounted for; they just seem shortened. Where he really goes to work is in manipulating the context of director D.W. Griffith’s images. He opens Rebirth not with early scenes from the film, but with a beat-heavy montage of nationalist symbols, including the American and British flags, the yin-yang, and the Confederate battle flag. We also see archival footage recalling notable moments in 20th Century civil rights history, and most memorably, a stagey, early-sound era sitdown with Griffith himself, who argues for the necessity of the 19th Century Klan and the trueness of his film—reflections punctuated by pensive drags on a cigarette while young white children listen at the doorway.
happy birthday :: on the upside, grey goes with everything.
Australia: Truth falls victim to the sparkling stone
Probably like many of you, crafting takes up a very small portion of what reality truly is around your home. I blog a lot about crafting and parties and all the pretty stuff. So...
2 tsp water
I haven’t yet bought a GPS, so perhaps one of those gizmos would make navigating about Cleveland a little easier, but I rather like my way of tossing the map in the back seat and winging it. Besides, if you never wander, how will you ever find those marvelous things that you never knew were there?
of the human experience.”
When mature Christians talks about faith, they have a distinct idea of what it means. To them, faith is more than just an idea or belief, it is their identity and their life. More and more, as younger Christians are faced with an ever widening pluralism in society, faith has taken on a new meaning. To the average young person in the church, the Christian faith is just one among many. With so many different ideas about God, a singular means of understanding Him is seen as narrow and bigoted. With tolerance being the theme of a generation, the distinctions of Christianity are the first to fall under attack.
4) I tried the much-discussed Brake Fluid Platen Restoration, and thought it worked great (in the short term). I'll check back in a few days. But for now? Oooh, the shiny blackness!
Like I said, I have no one to talk to about this so here I am on my blog venting my frustrations. I am not going to allow comments on this post because I don't want them. I just need a place to vent (and I know that certain people will see this and be upset and I am sorry but it is what it is and until the situation is remedied I have this as the only place to go). A part of me feels that if I just give her space she will come to me when she needs me or wants me. Another part of me feels like "screw you, you little brat" and if and when she needs/wants me maybe I won't be there for her. Yeah, that's a wrong way to handle it but it's how I feel. I really do love her and care about her a lot - maybe too much.
"Mercy me!" cried every young lady, and the fire was quickly put out. The tree no longer dared rustle a twig-it was awful! Wouldn't it be terrible if it were to drop one of its ornaments? Its own brilliance dazzled it.
So anyway ESPN took it to that place, and thus fucked themselves over, because they missed the mark. The better story isn’t that he’s Asian, so calling him Jeremy “The Asian Sensation” Lin is also sort of missing the mark . The story is that Jeremy Lin is playing like a fucking badass and nobody knew about the guy a month ago. That’s a story.
That underlying hum which comes from being in a busy public place
Mmmmm, it's looking like it.
Through sheer willpower (and a touch of Cronenberg-inspired body horror), Iguchi and Nishimura have shaped these everyday people into skilled character actors - now holding their own against some of Japan's finest.
Slip (peeking out from under dress): thrifted.
Last Saturday, we trooped over to Kwong Yik Seng at 144, Jalan Tun H.S. Lee. (We parked at Central Market, a 2-minute walk away.)
The scale took the form, then, of a set of situations or policy requirements wherein it was expected that people might divide in their responses. In response to each the subject was asked to tell whether he would 'Do what is right' (scored 3), 'Do what is to our own advantage' (scored 1) or 'Don't know' (scored 2). See the appendix for full details.
10.my brain is jelly
Sunday. Chair.
As a result, the study said, it can be concluded that “genetic effects take place in complex interaction with other genes and environments, and it is likely the combination of hundreds if not thousands of genes interacting with each other and with external stimuli that influence political attitudes and
Here's the hop list so you can get to Hoppin' if you started here. If you passing through just keep on hopping through the list. Happy Birthday Rio!!
Is everything new again?
Even if I work more and have a little more money, it’s nice to realise why I went DIY in the first place. My books will just as nice, less expensive. I will be able to sell them for less and make the same amount of money… any economist will tell you that is just good business.
Don't be shy now. Come to Austin, drink our beer, and spend your money.
Et voila!
I'm just going to say it. I'm suffering from a broken heart. Suffering being the operative term, and that translates to a kink in my I-Must-Write-for-the-Masses gene, so apologies for being MIA. In fact, I wasn't going to write about this at all, but heartache is universal, right? Plus this is my story and I get to post whatever the hell I want on my blog, and god knows (in his infinite imaginary wisdom) it is the one thing that actually does belong to me.
What on earth is that white stuff in the plastic sachet?
I am pretty much completely petrified by the prospect of my operation, which is now, as I write this, less than a week away. I'm constantly going over it in my head and essentially worrying/fretting/thinking about it all the time to the point where it's making me dizzy sometimes. I suspect that this will only get worse the closer the actual date approaches. I'm normally fairly switched-on, quick-witted (well I like to think so), and vivacious, but I'm just so preoccupied that I'm none of those things at the moment. I can't concentrate on anything nor do I feel like doing that.
I caught up with him afterward to point out that Paterson had just said the arena is going forward, downplaying the issue of eminent domain.
Nugget #4
Those on above-average earnings will have greater affordability but unless they are prepared to settle for the “average” dwelling above, the wedge proportion will remain the same though as size increases, the density is likely to fall somewhat.
Don’t do this. The only time you should use a verb instead of “said” is if your character is whispering. There is no way to show whispering through dialogue. If your character is yelling something, you’re probably using an exclamation point at the end of your sentence. Having an exclamation point and a said-tag using the word yelled is redundant.
But her eyes dark
Gap wide leg trousers
We were out taking part in Stargazing Live; our bit was organized by the lovely people of the Orwell Astronomical Society - unfortunately there weren't many telescopes, but we were there from the beginning of the event, and thus got to see Betelgeuse, Jupiter, The Pleiades (dumbed down now, apparently, to the mere Seven Sisters), Venus, Cassiopeia, and Orion. We also saw the space station whizz by.
December 2000, FlagSlam founded.
As an employment specialist, I hear more often than I can count, “I’ll take anything! Just give me a job.” The reality is all the people who have said this, are not being honest with themselves otherwise they would would be employed. We all have expectations, whether salary, location, job responsibilities, benefits, or environment. It is better to decide on what your expectations are and then target specific companies and jobs. The question is, “How do I decide what to pursue?”
Thanks again to all my bloggie friends for your inspiration and creativity!
CANT BLOODY WAIT!!
Thick Curds - 2 cups
Despite being female, I have a rather male attitude when it comes to being ill. At this moment in time, I am suffering with what could be described as ‘man flu’. When I rang my university doctor yesterday, I was told to turn up at the door at 7.55am today on the off chance that I would get an appointment. Of course, that was never going to happen so instead I decided to self-medicate and go to the local petrol station and buy some paracetamol. When I got to the till I encountered a problem which has inspired this blog post today. This problem also reminded me of other problems I have faced over the years whilst buying different items from the shop:
syukur for what i had n istiqamah for what the best^^
Hamas Meeting EU Officials is Not New Obama enlists the UN ‘human rights council’ in his reelection bid Arlene Kushner On Israel’s New Elections So, You Wanna Marry a Muslim Palestinian in America . . .? HAMAS Daddy Kidnaps Kids to Gaza Ehud Olmert Had Secret Channel to Communicate With Hamas’ Meshal Wednesday Night Comedy We are everywhere, and you cannot escape us! Video: Pat Condell: Hello Saudi Arabia The first Israeli humanitarian rescue mission – in 1953 Hitler discovers Obama stole his theme song
When you create a WordPress, things are different. On your Dashboard, you see a zillion things on the left-hand menu, and a perhaps-intimidating grid of information in the center. In fact, it might not be obvious at first how to make your first post!
FOR AFFECTED AREAS – WHEN NO MAJOR WAVES ARE OBSERVED FOR TWO
Because one day I will be a great mom. And it’s okay to admit that.
Just then I heard one of them blood-curdlin' squalls,
Stepping out of the elevator we emerged in a modern exhibit of expressionism. Basically it was a canopy bed with polyester clothing and a disco ball over the canopy, titled; Disco. What an introduction to modern art. She was confused and I thought it not worth explaining, on we went.
I feel embarrassed to say this but I am wearing fake nails. Too much stress coupled with wearing too much glitter over the last month and a habit to pick at my nail polish has lead to a lot of breakage and thinness of my nails. Three weeks ago they looked perfect and the best they had in a very long time. I'm sad about it now but there isn't much I can do about it.
That Samsung S3030 Tobi as well contains a good organizer and T9 who end users would definitely locate extremely usable day after day.In addition it shows up having a 1.3 megapixel photographic camera that’s a solution in 1280 pixels from 1024 pixels, not to mention designed to enable individuals that will gain even so pictures in addition to shifting videos footages.
Maida: 250 gms
After about 10 hours the delirium sets in and you begin to find things annoying or funny. Things that you wouldn't normally find funny or annoying but you just cant help it. Especially if your in the part of the corridor affectionately named the isolation ward. This is due to the fact you are behind a glass fire door and blocked off from the normal conversations and banter. Sometimes its nice to rest there though. The peace and quiet can be calming and there's a chair!
At this rate, it’s been said, it won’t be long before we’re all working for foreign companies. So how did we become so attractive to overseas predators? The answer is that it happened in stages, starting with the removal of regulations on overseas investment by former Tory Chancellor Geoffrey Howe in 1979.
*sad panda*
Schnorr TM, Grajewski BA, Murray WE. Video display terminals and spontaneous abortions (Letter). N Engl J Med 1991; 325: 813.
happy to cheer them on and enjoy to show.
I have had discussions with people about whether or not we would want to remain alive if we were to become a quadriplegic. I absolutely still would. It would be horrible, yes, but as crazy as I am about athletic pursuits, they do not DEFINE ME. Just because my life circumstances don’t fit my ideal life situation doesn’t mean I would want to throw my life away. Would I want to live after a traumatic brain injury? That I cannot answer. My initial response is no. I don’t want my body going on living without “me” in it. I would not want people to associate me, “Julia”, with a completely different person.
It should come as no surprise that Ballantyne loves pop music because his band along with producer, Magoo have created eleven lush and gorgeous tracks that have been polished to within an inch of their lives. It would be a good experiment to hear this lot coming from an old, battered radio because this would and could not dampen the collection’s overall feelings of rosy optimism. On Time To Let Go the tracks are out of this world and swirl and straddle the lines between reality and another dimension whether it is space and the present or dreams and alertness. So all that’s left to say is tune in and experience some fine, light and airy pop because the whole experience can really only be likened to the wonder of watching a colourful bird in full flight.
As a toddler most of Little Miss Adorable’s play involves ‘getting ready to go out’ or taking care of baby dolls or saying goodbye to baby dolls. She puts on her jacket, puts her Minnie Mouse cell phone into her purse, hoists her purse on her shoulder and directs us on how to take care of her babies. She then waves goodbye to her baby dolls and bum shuffles away. I know where that came from. Little Miss Adorable has watched me do this hundreds of times. What’s really funny is when she holds her Minnie Mouse phone up to her ear while ‘writing’ on her Magic Slate aka her ‘laptop’. This is clearly learned behaviour, and Little Miss Adorable is an exceptional mimic. She even copies her toddler program teacher by holding ‘circle time’ for her baby dolls. This is clear case for ‘nurture’ or environment shaping a person’s behaviour. This is learned behaviour.
Girls Girls Girls
Dear Mr. Ethiquette,
But the truth is, I'm none of those things, and I don't have any of it figured out. Not by a long shot. I fall apart more often than I'd like to admit. I have many weaknesses. I have many shortcomings. I have many flaws. I've been lucky in a lot of ways, in that I've been blessed with good friends who are always there to help me up when I fall. I've always surrounded myself with people who are smarter than me, stronger than me, wiser than me, better than me at whatever it is we have in common. And I learn from them. I have many heroes, and all of them have taught me something important about life. I've made some good choices. I've also made some really, really bad ones, but I've learned from those. My bad choices once led me to a place where I was able to find myself; where I learned what I really wanted (and, more importantly, what I didn't want) out of life. The things I learned there helped guide me toward making the good choices that got me to where I am today. I am living my dream, but not because I have life all figured out - just because I figured out what my dream was, and then I discovered that I could get there without too much work. So I made some choices that got me there.
After suggesting a GPS watch as a possible birthday gift, John reminded me that it’d be silly to wait until my birthday (June) when I could be using it right now, especially with the 1/2 marathon approaching. I have actually been browsing various watch selections for the last few months, but I finally made a commitment. The Garmin Forerunner 110. This watch uses a satellite to track my running and provide my pace, distance, and time. It also has the ability to sync with my computer and upload my running history to best track my progress. Awesome!
A lot of writers find themselves trying to decide between self-publishing and the traditional publishing route. Frankly, it’s a great time for writers because we do have options that weren’t available a few years ago. There is no right or wrong decision; it really is about what is right for that author and where they are in their career. The self-publishing route offers the benefit of making your book available to readers, without facing possible rejection and revisions. And that can be a wonderful thing, as long as your book is ready to be published. That said, most traditionally published authors will tell you that they are glad their first books didn’t get published because they learned so much during the journey — even though at the time, they were certain the books were fabulous. A lot of authors who have written a book that just didn’t fit into a genre niche are finding success in self-publishing because readers aren’t nearly as picky about genre specifics as publishers have to be. A writer serious about her career and considering self publishing should attempt to make sure the end product is as close to perfect as possible. This may or may not require the hiring of others to help you through the process. So the overhead of getting a book ready to self-publish — including editing, line editing, formatting, and cover design, may vary. many self-published authors are finding, having the book available doesn’t ensure readers will buy it. Self-publishing means self-marketing, and that can take a lot of writing time away from an author. That said, today even traditionally published authors have to spend a lot of time marketing themselves as well. Some authors simply are better at promoting their work than others. And while there have been numerous success stories of authors who have built themselves a very lucrative career through self-publishing, others who followed this path are not finding the financial gains as they had hoped. It bears mentioning, however, that many new authors who have gone the traditional path of publishing are equally unhappy about their financial gain. Also, many of the traditionally published authors may find their contracts dropped if sales are really down — something a self-published author doesn’t have to worry about. In most instances, writers who have already made a name for themselves, and have a fan base, are finding the self-publishing route an easier path than do new writers. However, the truth is that anything and everything is possible. If a friend came to me with a first book, and this friend simply wasn't a marketing whiz, I might suggest they attempt the traditional route first; but if that route didn't pan out and she felt her book was ready, then I would encourage them to take it the self-publishing route. That said, if this person has a viable marketing plan to ensure that her book goes out big, I’d say her chances of earning more financial gain might be with the self-publishing route than the traditional route because of the smaller royalty rate earned through traditional publishing. Having a publisher behind you does NOT mean your book will be any more successful, but a publisher’s name still carries some weight to some readers and traditional bookstores. Building a name with a publisher behind you is a little easier than building it on your own. Another thing to take into consideration is, unless you are one of the talented writers who have the ability to do everything from designing a cover to a final editing, there is overhead in self-publishing. So as you can see, both routes can bring success and both come with some positives and negatives to consider.
The belt is also key for the looks below, which I'd describe as examples of the "fold up and belt" technique.
Of Australia, runner
So in September I told Jesse the news and began making arrangements to move out. In November I moved out with the girls to a new house in Gilbert. We absolutely love the area and the girls have responded better than I expected. Jesse found a place in Tempe about 15 minutes away so the traveling back and forth is not too difficult.
The Pacific region (Alaska, Hawaii, California, Oregon and Washington) has the highest average cost-value ratio in the country, at 71.3 percent, “largely because the high cost of remodeling in the region is more than offset by high values at resale,” according to the report.
FLO Residence (pictured), a 530-unit condo development in Punggol is set to launch this month at an average price of S$850 psf.
I plan to just tie a pretty bow around the cards, add some cookies, and maybe a plant or something to the basket.
I met lots of my fellow Brooklynites and bloggers. I am terrible with names and faces and, well, people, mostly, so if I met you or gave you a card, please leave a comment below to slap me a reminder! A special shout out to my neighbors Brenda of Crazy Stable, and Anne of Sustainable Flatbush, both of whom I met for the first time last night.
Don't just use it as an excuse to cheap out though.
This was a bit hard on Dave, who hadn’t even been asking for money, but he wasn’t the kind of boy to hold grudges. Early in December, he and Jill asked his Dad over for Christmas lunch with Jill’s parents, who had a humble little home in Hackney. But the cussed Yorshireman wasn’t having any of it.
It helps that these songs delve into deep, dark matters of betrayal and loss — and address them in myriad ways, from the wounded grace of "She's 22" to the vengeful hurt of "Miriam." Along the way, Jones coos and struts her way through a handful of crackerjack pop songs: "Say Goodbye," the smoothly sinister title track and the single "Happy Pills" all meet at the midpoint between Jones' past work and the fizzy pop Burton makes with Broken Bells. Always more versatile than most people think, Jones fits all of this smart material to perfection, marking her second decade as a star while making her sound cooler and more unflappably sophisticated than ever.
Shag, the tiny Jack Russell, looked over at Moon.
However, there’s one additional area where we can divide the affluent from the mega-wealthy and really construct a 99% coalition – by maintaining the real income of professional incomes while decreasing their gross income through reducing professional costs and professional prices. For example, taking over the costs of medical malpractice insurance could allow doctors to save a median of $12.5k a year and pass that on to the consumer in the form of 2.5-6.7% lower prices for medical bills. Reducing the cost of going to professional schools like law and medical schools would mean that new lawyers and doctors would need about $200,000 less in earnings to break even from their debts, which would mean that their gross incomes could be significantly reduced (which in turn would lower the cost of health care and medical bills, while increasing the relative demand for their services) without affecting their take-home income.
Sorry for the teaser, but we're weaning Xander off the oxygen. At the doctor's office yesterday, he passed his room air challenge and we were told to go ahead and turn his oxygen off for several hours a day, like three in the morning and three in the afternoon. He needs the oxygen most when he sleeps, so nap time and night time will still require the cannula. But before we left the doctor, we took the cannula off his face and it was a revelation. He is a new man. Such a nose. And an upper lip. I kinda forgot he had those. And you can see up his nostrils. He has boogers. Cute, gross boogers. Though he's done it every day for weeks and weeks now, it's like he smiled at me for the first time.
Unlike the Old Testament we no longer build altars to sacrifice animals animals to God. Still, altars play a huge role in our lives. Just as baptism is a New-Testament representation of circumcision, the altars we build in our hearts are a representation of the physical altars built in the Old-Testament.
This has to stop
4. you can also add a splash of amaretto or grand marnier at this point or a sprinkle of cinnamon.
Illusion, I cannot find you.
Racing NSW's colour is green
To break this circle, we need some optimism and belief. Optimism that days can be better and the belief to build a better tomorrow. For what has happened, has happened. The time cannot be turned back. The people who had to suffer have suffered. The people who had to be benefitted by these sufferings have been benefitted. So now, a very important question lies in front of the present generation. Do we want to live a life which our fore-fathers have been through? Or do we want to see a better and transformed India. A united India. The task of transforming our childhood picture of India into a reality now lies in our hands. It is up to us whether we step in to the shoes of our parents and inherit their distorted ideas of unity; or bring back the ideals of unity from stories and plant it in our country. We are the ones who can craft a developed India. We are the ones who can infuse life into the Man who existed in our moral science books. It is our responsibility to break free from the idea of riots and disruptions to save the real harmony. The onus of preventing the previous massacres is now on our shoulders. We need to forget the wrong doings, forgive the wrong-doers and move on. We need to love every creation of The Almighty and defend its right to exist, for if we defend others, others will defend us too. And this is how, peace will prevail.
We can stop calling children brats, or cute little creatures, and start recognizing that they are fully human, just like us. After all, we were them not long ago. When they are upset, they need something, and it's not a smack or "the look" of disgust and disapproval. It's love. It's a hug. It's help figuring out why they are upset and how we can fix it.
Z: Research? How do you prefer to do it; plane/train/automobile, laptop or library?
“What if I make you a new one?” Flamane suggested helpfully, ” I can even make it sparkly?”
Hey everyone –
We can all be free
One of the recurring thoughts I have now is “Healer, heal thyself.” And I’m doing the work. And you know what I think of myself now? I am good enough. I’m not a loser. I don’t doubt myself. I’m not responsible for everything around me. That doesn’t mean that fear doesn’t slip in every once in a while and ask me if I’m sure, but I’ve learned how to work with those thoughts.
A woman whose love
More suggestions anyone??
Rub your finger around a couple of times to smooth out the lumps and then brush on to the clay lightly and in circles.
Caveat Emptor.
They are so much easier than trying to fumble with those freaking clips. OH THOSE CLIPS. One-handed my ass (ok, some of them really are, but some of them are a pain in the butt.)
The dual system of citizenships based on race and face doubtless make carrying out any measures to benefit the people more difficult. Would be unconscionable for the state to continue these political differences? Tacit approval by inaction only weakens the right and voice of those who should act at a considerate pace. The dual system of citizenships (aka non-Bumi / Bumi) based on race and faith, doubtless make carrying out any measures to benefit the people more difficult.
Salina Yoon is a wonderful author with over 180 books published — and counting. If you are a parent, you probably have owned at least one of her super-creative board or novelty books. One of my kids’ favorite was FIVE SILLY TURKEYS – at least until yesterday. KALEIDOSCOPE is Ms. Yoon’s newest title, and it’s a stunner! Every page gorgeous in color, and the rhyming text is playful and a delight to read aloud. Of course, being a Salina Yoon book, it’s also amazingly interactive.
For such little changes it was a lot of work (mostly thanks to the evil natures of the fabrics involved) but so worth it in the end. Which of course begs the question why didn't I just do that the first time?! I blame the sleep deprivation and the fact that my brain had to keep track of too many things the week I finished the dress. Oh well - it's fixed now!
Naturally she turned and left.
Of course, once someone starts taking drugs or abusing alcohol, a chemical addiction takes over and impedes their ability to stop. But they’re not the only ones.
"Why yes it is Jacklyn," Philip replied. "What have you got there?"
It's weird how time feels as though it goes quicker as you get get older.
Bake the cookies at 350 for 12 – 15 minutes, when the edges are lightly browned. Leave the cookies on the cookie sheet for a few minutes before removing them to wire racks to cool.
It's going to come with me to Asilomar, for my quilting class with Sue Rasmussen. Very fitting, since it had its genesis in a class at Asilomar.
The Lord has reminded me yet again that while I love my warm bed in the still dark morning, that my days go better when I get up early, send Howard off, get myself dressed, get a cup of coffee and pray and read before the children get up...when I have had he opportunity to start my day with Him in the quiet peace of the morning it definitely has an impact on the entire day, yet that soft warm bed entices me.
Monday hits me like a freight train. I email my friend to ask whether she is all right and if my phone, wallet and keys are at her place because I can’t find them, nor do I recall what I did with them. This was at 10:00 in the morning. Since I haven’t eaten anything in over 24 hours, we decided to go to Perkins and get some sort of food in me. Only Denny’s would be a better/worse choice, but Woodbury doesn’t have a Denny’s that is as close as the Perkins is to my dad’s house, so we go there and I order pancakes because they sound like the most delicious thing on the planet and will hopefully soak up some of the alcohol that is still swimming around in my bloodstream. As this is the worst hangover of my life to this point, I order the full meal deal. Eggs, pancakes, hash browns and bacon. I have no clue why I ordered what I did, but it sounded good at the time. The water tastes like I imagine heaven to taste. The pancakes were amazing to be honest, but I couldn’t eat all of them as I still felt like puking because of my raging headache. We went home and I took a nap.
1 morning
shake your trust in your friends, but equally that it takes you a
However, every sentient being has within itself a divine imperative to evolve – and it will. But when it does so, it is through its own choice…although, of course, it has all the time necessary to see, understand, and make that choice. It is a choice it cannot fail to make because it is God’s Will that it do so, and because at the deepest level it is one with God, therefore God’s Will is its will.
and kiss me forever
It was a few minutes before Mel finally cleared his throat and began.
Sweet, precious Daniel, know that we are doing all we can to get to you as quickly as possible. Your brother and sisters talk about you numerous times each and every day. We already consider you one of us, but we sure can't wait to make it official!
They had received no less than six reports within the last half-hour about three hookers on Highway 60 -two females near “Perkins”; and one male – near “Hooters”. The descriptions matched us.
And this, of course, is not the extent of Obama’s trampling on the freedoms of the American public. The recent passage of CISPA, a draconian piece of legislation aimed at imposing government control on the internet, or the Executive Order entitled “National Defense Resource Preparedness”, which allows the Executive branch to seize control of the nation’s industries, transportation and energy, as well as to utilize the military domestically however the President sees fit; all of this represents a systemic pattern, not a handful of isolated incidents.
“Didn’t you watch us as we held
There is no softness I won’t swallow.
“about 75 or so people (I’m bad with numbers, could have been 50 or 100) linked arms around the bus to prevent it from leaving. It didn’t take long for the cops to get really violent. There were probably about 20 cops at least. They pushed from in front of the line (on the bus side) and others grabbed us from behind and threw us down. They tried to hold us in place as the bus started moving but we broke loose and tried to regroup in front of the bus to stop it but there were so many police at this point it was hard to re-form a line. We were making scattered attempts to link arms, lie down in front, and lie down in piles. They cleared the way, trying to scare people by being very brutal. I watched my friend get tackled by a fat bald cop and get punched in the face. I got picked up and thrown down several times. I think everyone did. Several of us tried to move a picnic table to use as a barricade but it got overrun. Then the cops got their tasers out. Tasers, with their red laser sights and bright blue electric sparks, are incredibly intimidating. I watched at least 3 or 4 people get tasered right in front of me. One guy was lying face down in the road. 3 or 4 cops ran over to him, surrounded him, and wouldn’t let him get out for at least 10 or 15 seconds as one of the cops tasered him over and over. Eventually they got the bus out after traveling a couple hundred yards and us fighting the whole way.”
I know I said this was the quick and dirty method but hang in there with me.
